Missouri, session 2026, HB2097.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 23.295, 135.713, 135.714, 135.715,
135.716, 135.719, 160.575, 161.106, 162.261, 162.720, 166.700,
166.705, 166.710, 166.715, 174.300, 174.332, 174.450, 174.453,
174.610, 175.020, 178.530, 178.550, 178.585, 178.632, 186.019,
288.040, 620.010, 620.484, 620.490, 620.511, 620.512, and
620.513, RSMo, and section 167.910 as enacted by house bill no.
1606, ninety-ninth general assembly, second regular session,
and section 167.910 as enacted by house bill no. 1415, ninety-


ninth general assembly, second regular session, and section
210.1700 as enacted by conference committee substitute for
senate substitute for senate bill no. 1421, one hundred third
general assembly, second regular session, are repealed and
thirty-six new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as
sections 23.295, 67.5420, 135.713, 135.714, 135.715, 135.716,
135.719, 160.575, 161.106, 162.261, 162.720, 166.700, 166.705,
166.710, 166.715, 173.2565, 173.2566, 173.2570, 173.2571,
173.2572, 174.300, 174.332, 174.450, 174.453, 174.610, 175.020,
178.530, 178.550, 178.585, 178.632, 186.019, 210.1700, 288.040,
620.010, 1, and 2, to read as follows:
23.295. If an employee is displaced because a program
is sunset, reorganized, or continued, the state agency and
the [division] office of workforce development in the
department of [economic] higher education and workforce
development shall make a reasonable effort to relocate the
displaced employee.
67.5420. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms shall mean:
(1) "Board", the board of directors appointed pursuant
to section 210.861;
(2) "Child care provider", any entity that is licensed
under section 210.221 and that provides early childhood
education services;
(3) "City", any city not within a county;
(4) "Early childhood education services", the same as
defined in section 161.244, which may include transportation
related to such services;
(5) "Early childhood education service provider", any
public school or charter school that is contracted with the
department of elementary and secondary education to provide
early childhood education services that adhere to the
quality standards as provided in section 161.213.


2. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, all revenues generated by any tax imposed by a
city and approved by the voters for the purposes of
establishing an early childhood education and child care
services fund to improve the quality of, affordability of,
and access to early childhood development programs and child
care for children aged five years and younger shall be
deposited in the city treasury to the credit of a special
"Early Childhood Education and Child Care Fund" to
accomplish the purposes set out in this section and shall be
used for no other purpose.
3. The administrative control and management of the
funds in the early childhood education and child care fund
and all programs to be funded therefrom shall rest solely
with the board and shall be expended for early childhood
education services and child care services. The board shall
not be mandated to expend funds by an act of the general
assembly without a majority vote of the voters of the city.
The board shall use or disburse the funds in the early
childhood education and child care fund to provide and
administer programs improving the quality, affordability,
and access to early childhood development and child care
programs for children aged five years and younger. The
funds may be used for early childhood education services
provided by early childhood education service providers and
child care providers.
4. (1) The board may contract with any provider to
provide early childhood education services and child care
services and may place conditions on the use of such funds.
The board shall reserve the right to audit the expenditure
of any and all funds. The board may establish eligibility
standards for the receipt and use of such funds. No member
of the board shall serve on the governing body, have any


financial interest in, or be employed by any entity that is
a recipient of funds from the early childhood education and
child care fund.
(2) Funds expended by the board pursuant to this
section shall be expended in the following order of priority:
(a) For children in financial or familial need, as
determined by the board;
(b) For all other services provided pursuant to this
section.
(3) In addition to the priorities provided in
subdivision (2) of this subsection, a child care provider
shall prioritize the placement of children from families who
can document that they are on a waitlist for the department
of elementary and secondary education's child care subsidy
program.
5. The board shall only provide funding for early
childhood education services or child care services to
providers who serve children residing in the city.
6. The board may accept any gift of property or moneys
for the use and benefit of the persons to be served through
the programs established and funded under this section and
may sell or exchange any such property so long as such sale
or exchange is in the best interests of the programs
provided under this section and the proceeds from such sale
or exchange are used exclusively to fund such programs. The
board may solicit, accept, and expend grants from private or
public entities and enter into agreements to effectuate such
grants so long as the transaction is in the best interest of
the programs provided by the board and the proceeds are used
exclusively to fund such programs.
7. The provisions of subsections 3 to 6 of section
210.861 shall not apply to revenues deposited into the early


childhood education and child care fund and administered
pursuant to this subsection.
135.713. 1. Any taxpayer who makes a qualifying
contribution to an educational assistance organization after
August 28, 2021, may claim a credit against the tax
otherwise due under chapter 143, other than taxes withheld
under sections 143.191 to 143.265, and chapter 153 in an
amount equal to one hundred percent of the amount the
taxpayer contributed during the tax year for which the
credit is claimed. No taxpayer shall claim a credit
pursuant to sections 135.712 to 135.719 for any contribution
made by the taxpayer, or an agent of the taxpayer, on behalf
of the taxpayer's dependent or, in the case of a business
taxpayer, on behalf of the business's agent's dependent.
2. The amount of the tax credit claimed shall not
exceed fifty percent of the taxpayer's state tax liability
for the tax year for which the credit is claimed. The
[state treasurer] department of elementary and secondary
education shall certify the tax credit amount to the
taxpayer. A taxpayer may carry the credit forward to any of
his or her four subsequent tax years. All tax credits
authorized pursuant to the program shall not be transferred,
sold, or assigned, and are not refundable.
3. The cumulative amount of tax credits that may be
allocated to all taxpayers contributing to educational
assistance organizations in any one calendar year shall not
exceed a maximum of seventy-five million dollars. Such
maximum amount shall be annually adjusted by the [state
treasurer] department of elementary and secondary education
in an amount equal to the percent increase or decrease in
the amount of state aid distributed to school districts
pursuant to the provisions of section 163.031 in the current
fiscal year as compared to such amount in the preceding


fiscal year, rounded to the nearest thousandth. The [state
treasurer] department of elementary and secondary education
shall establish a procedure by which, from the beginning of
the calendar year until August first, the cumulative amount
of tax credits shall be allocated on a first-come, first-
served basis among all educational assistance
organizations. If an educational assistance organization
fails to use all, or some percentage to be determined by the
[state treasurer] department of elementary and secondary
education, of its allocated tax credits during this period,
the [state treasurer] department of elementary and secondary
education may reallocate these unused tax credits to those
educational assistance organizations that have used all, or
some percentage to be determined by the [state treasurer]
department of elementary and secondary education, of their
allocated tax credits during this period. The [state
treasurer] department of elementary and secondary education
may establish more than one period and reallocate more than
once during each calendar year. The [state treasurer]
department of elementary and secondary education shall
establish the procedure described in this subsection in such
a manner as to ensure that taxpayers can claim all the tax
credits possible up to the cumulative amount of tax credits
available for the calendar year.
4. A taxpayer who makes a contribution to an education
assistance organization shall not designate the student who
will receive a scholarship grant.
5. The provisions of sections 135.712 to 135.719 and
sections 166.700 to 166.720 shall be effective in any fiscal
year immediately after any fiscal year in which the amount
appropriated for pupil transportation pursuant to section
163.161 equals or exceeds forty percent of the projected
amount necessary to fully fund transportation aid funding


for fiscal year 2021. If the amount appropriated for
transportation pursuant to section 163.161 in any succeeding
year falls below such amount, no additional scholarships for
newly qualified students shall be awarded.
135.714. 1. Each educational assistance organization
shall:
(1) Notify the [state treasurer] department of
elementary and secondary education of such organization's
intent to provide scholarship accounts to qualified students;
(2) Demonstrate to the [state treasurer] department of
elementary and secondary education that such organization is
exempt from federal income tax under Section 501(c)(3) of
the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended;
(3) Provide a [state treasurer-approved] receipt
approved by the department of elementary and secondary
education to taxpayers for contributions made to the
organization;
(4) Ensure that grants are distributed to scholarship
accounts of qualified students in the following order:
(a) Qualified students who received a scholarship
grant in the previous school year;
(b) Qualified students who are siblings of qualified
students who will receive a scholarship grant in the current
school year;
(c) Qualified students that have an approved
"individualized education plan" (IEP) developed under the
federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (IDEA),
20 U.S.C. Section 1400, et seq., as amended, or who have
been diagnosed with dyslexia, as the term "dyslexia" is
defined in section 633.420;
(d) Qualified students who are eligible for free lunch
as approved by the department of elementary and secondary
education in accordance with federal regulations and who


reside in an unaccredited or provisionally accredited school
district;
(e) Qualified students who are eligible for reduced
price lunch as approved by the department of elementary and
secondary education in accordance with federal regulations
and who reside in an unaccredited or provisionally
accredited school district;
(f) Qualified students who are eligible for free lunch
as approved by the department of elementary and secondary
education in accordance with federal regulations;
(g) Qualified students who are eligible for reduced
price lunch as approved by the department of elementary and
secondary education in accordance with federal regulations;
(h) Qualified students who are active duty military
dependents who have relocated to Missouri and are enrolling
in a school in the state for the first time; and
(i) All other qualified students;
(5) Ensure that:
(a) One hundred percent of such organization's
revenues from interest or investments is spent on
scholarship accounts;
(b) At least ninety percent of such organization's
revenues from qualifying contributions is spent on
scholarship accounts; and
(c) [Marketing and] Administrative expenses do not
exceed the following limits of such organization's remaining
revenue from contributions:
a. Ten percent for the first two hundred fifty
thousand dollars;
b. Eight percent for the next five hundred thousand
dollars; and
c. Three percent thereafter;


(6) (a) Distribute scholarship account payments
either four times per year or in a single lump sum at the
beginning of the year as requested by the parent of a
qualified student, based on the state adequacy target as
defined in section 163.011 and calculated by the department
of elementary and secondary education, subject to the
following total grant amount limits:
a. For a qualified student who meets the criteria to
be included in a school district's limited English
proficiency pupil count as set forth in subdivision (8) of
section 163.011, not more than one hundred sixty percent of
the state adequacy target;
b. For a qualified student who is eligible for free or
reduced price lunch as approved by the department of
elementary and secondary education in accordance with
federal regulations, not more than one hundred twenty-five
percent of the state adequacy target;
c. For a qualified student who has an approved
individualized education plan developed under the federal
Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (IDEA), 20
U.S.C. Section 1400, et seq., as amended, not more than one
hundred seventy-five percent of the state adequacy target;
and
d. For all other qualified students, not more than the
state adequacy target;
(b) Scholarship account payments distributed under
this subdivision shall be in the form of a deposit into the
scholarship account of the qualified student;
(7) Provide the [state treasurer] department of
elementary and secondary education, upon request, with
criminal background checks on all such organization's
employees and board members and exclude from employment or


governance any individual who might reasonably pose a risk
to the appropriate use of contributed funds;
(8) Demonstrate such organization's financial
accountability by:
(a) Submitting to the [state treasurer] department of
elementary and secondary education annual audit financial
100 statements by a certified public accountant within six
101 months of the end of the educational assistance
102 organization's fiscal year; and
103 (b) Having [an] the state auditor certify that the
104 report is free of material misstatements; and
105 (9) Ensure that participating students take the state
106 achievement tests or nationally norm-referenced tests that
107 measure learning gains in math and English language arts,
108 and provide for value-added assessment, in grades that
109 require testing under the statewide assessment system set
110 forth in section 160.518;
111 (10) Allow costs of the testing requirements to be
112 covered by the scholarships distributed by the educational
113 assistance organization;
114 (11) Provide the parents of each student who was
115 tested with a copy of the results of the tests on an annual
116 basis, beginning with the first year of testing;
117 (12) Provide the test results to [the state treasurer
118 ,] the department of elementary and secondary education[,
119 and the board established in section 135.715 ]on an annual
120 basis, beginning with the first year of testing;
121 (13) Report student information that would allow [the
122 state treasurer,] the department of elementary and secondary
123 education[, and the board established in section 135.715] to
124 aggregate data by grade level, gender, family income level,
125 and race;


126 (14) Provide rates of high school graduation, college
127 attendance, and college graduation for participating
128 students to the [state treasurer, the] department of
129 elementary and secondary education[, and the board
130 established in section 135.715] in a manner consistent with
131 nationally recognized standards;
132 (15) Provide to the [state treasurer, the] department
133 of elementary and secondary education[, and the board
134 established in section 135.715] the results from an annual
135 parental satisfaction survey, including information about
136 the number of years that the parent's child has participated
137 in the scholarship program. The annual satisfaction survey
138 shall ask parents of scholarship students to express:
139 (a) Their level of satisfaction with the child's
140 academic achievement, including academic achievement at the
141 schools the child attends through the scholarship program
142 versus academic achievement at the school previously
143 attended;
144 (b) Their level of satisfaction with school safety at
145 the schools the child attends through the scholarship
146 program versus safety at the schools previously attended;
147 (16) Demonstrate such organization's financial
148 viability, if such organization is to receive donations of
149 fifty thousand dollars or more during the school year, by
150 filing with the [state treasurer] department of elementary
151 and secondary education before the start of the school year
152 a surety bond payable to the state in an amount equal to the
153 aggregate amount of contributions expected to be received
154 during the school year or other financial information that
155 demonstrates the financial viability of the educational
156 assistance organization.
157 2. The annual audit required under this section shall
158 include:


159 (1) The name and address of the educational assistance
160 organization;
161 (2) The name and address of each qualified student for
162 whom a parent opened a scholarship account with the
163 organization;
164 (3) The total number and total dollar amount of
165 contributions received during the previous calendar year; and
166 (4) The total number and total dollar amount of
167 scholarship accounts opened during the previous calendar
168 year.
169 3. The [state treasurer] department of elementary and
170 secondary education shall:
171 (1) Ensure compliance with all student privacy laws
172 for data in the [state treasurer's] department's possession;
173 (2) Collect all test results;
174 (3) Provide the test results and associated learning
175 gains to the public via a state website after the third year
176 of test and test-related data collection. The findings
177 shall be aggregated by the students' grade level, gender,
178 family income level, number of years of participation in the
179 scholarship program, and race; and
180 (4) Provide graduation rates to the public via a state
181 website after the third year of test and test-related data
182 collection.
183 4. The [state treasurer] department of elementary and
184 secondary education shall cause the following information to
185 be posted on the [state treasurer's] department's website
186 annually, provided that no personally identifiable
187 information of any student is released:
188 (1) The number of students who have been awarded a
189 scholarship to date and the number of students who have been
190 awarded a scholarship in the current school year;


191 (2) The number of scholarship recipients enrolled in
192 each qualified school, along with the number of recipients
193 who qualify for free and reduced price lunch and the number
194 of recipients who receive special education services and the
195 type of special education services received. Such
196 information shall be broken down by school year and the
197 total to date;
198 (3) The total number of scholarship recipients who are
199 eligible for free and reduced price lunch as approved by the
200 department of elementary and secondary education in
201 accordance with federal guidelines, broken down by school
202 year and the total to date;
203 (4) The total number of scholarship recipients who
204 have an individualized education plan (IEP) developed under
205 the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, 20
206 U.S.C. Section 1400, et seq., as amended, broken down by
207 school year and the total to date;
208 (5) The number of scholarship recipients who have
209 received a grant from each educational assistance
210 organization, broken down by school year and the total to
211 date;
212 (6) The student test scores required to be posted
213 online pursuant to subdivision (3) of subsection 3 of this
214 section;
215 (7) The results of the parent satisfaction survey
216 required annually pursuant to subdivision (15) of subsection
217 1 of this section;
218 (8) The average dollar amount of a scholarship grant
219 for all students who participate in the program;
220 (9) The average dollar amount of a scholarship grant
221 for all students who participate in the program and who have
222 an IEP;


223 (10) The average duration of a student's participation
224 in the program;
225 (11) The number of students who are in their first
226 year of participation in the program;
227 (12) A list of the educational assistance
228 organizations that make contributions to the empowerment
229 scholarship accounts of students enrolled in each qualified
230 school; and
231 (13) The total amount of money that has been remitted
232 from qualified students' empowerment scholarship accounts to
233 each qualified school, broken down by school year and the
234 total aggregate amount.
235 5. An educational assistance organization may contract
236 with private financial management firms to manage
237 scholarship accounts with the supervision of the [state
238 treasurer] department of elementary and secondary education,
239 provided that all laws and regulations that apply to
240 employees of such educational assistance organization shall
241 also apply to the actions of any employees of the management
242 firm while they are conducting work relating to the direct
243 decision-making of the operation of such educational
244 assistance organization.
245 6. The program shall not be marketed, advertised,
246 promoted, or otherwise publicized by the department of
247 elementary and secondary education except to the extent
248 strictly necessary for the routine administration of the
249 program and not for promotion or outreach.
135.715. 1. The cumulative amount of tax credits that
may be allocated to all taxpayers contributing to
educational assistance organizations in the first year of
the program shall not exceed twenty-five million dollars.
2. The [state treasurer] department of elementary and
secondary education shall limit the number of educational


assistance organizations that are certified to administer
scholarship accounts to no more than ten such organizations
in any single school year. If the total contributions to
educational assistance organizations exceed twenty-five
million dollars in any school year, the [state treasurer]
department of elementary and secondary education may certify
one additional educational assistance organization to
administer scholarship accounts. No more than seven of such
organizations shall have their principal place of business
in:
(1) A county of the first classification with more
than two hundred sixty thousand but fewer than three hundred
thousand inhabitants;
(2) A county with a charter form of government and
with more than six hundred thousand but fewer than seven
hundred thousand inhabitants;
(3) A county with a charter form of government and
with more than three hundred thousand but fewer than four
hundred fifty thousand inhabitants;
(4) A county with a charter form of government and
with more than nine hundred fifty thousand inhabitants; or
(5) A city not within a county.
3. [The state treasurer may delegate any duties
assigned to the state treasurer under sections 135.712 to
135.719 and sections 166.700 to 166.720 to the "Missouri
Empowerment Scholarship Accounts Board", which is hereby
established. The Missouri empowerment scholarship accounts
board shall consist of the state treasurer, who shall serve
as chair, the commissioner of the department of higher
education and workforce development, the commissioner of
education, one member appointed by the president pro tempore
of the senate, one member appointed by the speaker of the
house of representatives, one member appointed by the


governor with the advice and consent of the senate, and one
member appointed by the six aforementioned board members who
is an employee of an educational assistance organization and
whose responsibilities are directly related to such
organization's involvement in the empowerment scholarship
accounts program. The appointed members shall serve terms
of four years or until their successors have been appointed
and qualified. The board shall have all powers and duties
assigned to the state treasurer under sections 135.712 to
135.719 and sections 166.700 to 166.720 that are delegated
to the board by the state treasurer. The board shall assist
the state treasurer with data collection, collaboration with
the department of elementary and secondary education, making
recommendations to the state treasurer regarding the
promulgation of rules concerning the program. Members of
the board shall not receive compensation for their service,
but may receive reimbursement for necessary expenses.
4. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 7 of
section 135.716 to the contrary,] Four percent of the total
qualifying contributions received by each educational
assistance organization per calendar year shall be deposited
in the Missouri empowerment scholarship accounts fund to be
used by the [state treasurer] department of elementary and
secondary education for [marketing and] actual
administrative expenses or the costs incurred in
administering the program, whichever is less. The
department of elementary and secondary education shall
establish procedures to ensure the percentage of funds for
administration of the program is directed to the department
in a timely manner with the necessary information to verify
the correct amount has been transmitted.
[5.] 4. Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision
(5) of subsection 2 of section 135.712 to the contrary, the


term "qualifying contribution" shall mean a donation of
cash, including, but not limited to, checks drawn on a
banking institution located in the continental United States
in U.S. dollars (other than cashier checks, or third-party
checks exceeding ten thousand dollars), money orders,
payroll deductions, and electronic fund transfers. This
term shall not include stocks, bonds, other marketable
securities, or property.
135.716. 1. The [state treasurer] department of
elementary and secondary education shall provide a
standardized format for a receipt to be issued by an
educational assistance organization to a taxpayer to
indicate the value of a contribution received. The
department of revenue shall require a taxpayer to provide a
copy of this receipt if claiming the tax credit authorized
by the program.
2. The [state treasurer] department of elementary and
secondary education shall provide a standardized format for
educational assistance organizations to report the
information required in subsection 1 of this section.
3. The [state treasurer] department of elementary and
secondary education or state auditor may conduct an
investigation if the [state treasurer] department of
elementary and secondary education possesses evidence of
fraud committed by the educational assistance organization.
4. The [state treasurer] department of elementary and
secondary education may bar an educational assistance
organization from participating in the program if the [state
treasurer] department establishes that the educational
assistance organization has intentionally and substantially
failed to comply with the requirements of section 135.714.
If the [state treasurer] department bars an educational
assistance organization from the program under this


subsection, the organization shall notify affected qualified
students and their parents of the decision as soon as
possible after the decision is made.
5. The state treasurer shall issue a report on the
state of the program five years after it goes into effect.
The report shall include, but is not limited to:
(1) Information regarding the finances of the
educational assistance organizations; and
(2) Educational outcomes of qualified students.
6. (1) There is hereby created in the state treasury
the "Missouri Empowerment Scholarship Accounts Fund", which
shall consist of moneys collected under this section. The
state treasurer shall be custodian of the fund. In
accordance with sections 30.170 and 30.180, the state
treasurer may approve disbursements. The fund shall be a
dedicated fund, and moneys in the fund shall be used solely
by the [state treasurer] department of elementary and
secondary education for the purposes of sections 135.712 to
135.719.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080
to the contrary, any moneys remaining in the fund at the end
of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the
general revenue fund.
(3) The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the
fund in the same manner as other funds are invested. Any
interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
credited to the fund.
[7. Two percent of the total qualifying contributions
received by each educational assistance organization per
calendar year shall be deposited in the Missouri empowerment
scholarship accounts fund to be used by the state treasurer
for marketing and administrative expenses or the costs
incurred in administering the program, whichever is less.


The state treasurer shall establish procedures to ensure
the percentage of funds for administration of the program is
directed to the state treasurer in a timely manner with the
necessary information to verify the correct amount has been
transmitted.]
135.719. 1. The [state treasurer] department of
elementary and secondary education and the department of
revenue may promulgate rules to implement the provisions of
sections 135.712 to 135.719. Any rules in effect on July 1,
2027, shall remain in effect until repealed or modified by
the department of elementary and secondary education or the
department of revenue. Any rule or portion of a rule, as
that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created
under the authority delegated in this section shall become
effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of
the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
2021, shall be invalid and void.
2. The provisions of section 23.253 of the Missouri
sunset act shall not apply to sections 135.712 to 135.719.
160.575. 1. The department of elementary and
secondary education shall develop a "ready to work"
endorsement program that enables high schools to endorse a
certificate for students who meet certain standards that
demonstrate that such students are deemed ready to work.
The program shall be available no later than June 30, 2007.
2. The program shall include, but not be limited to,
the following:


(1) Voluntary participation by high school seniors who
choose to participate;
(2) Academic components;
(3) Work readiness components;
(4) Assessment tools and techniques for a third-party,
independent, and objective assessment and endorsement of
individual student achievement through an existing workforce
investment service delivery system; and
(5) An easily identifiable guarantee to potential
employers that the entry-level employee is ready to work.
3. In developing such standards, the department shall
involve representatives of the [division] office of
workforce development, employers, students, career center
providers, local workforce investment boards, and school
district personnel.
161.106. 1. The department of elementary and
secondary education shall provide staffing support including
but not limited to statewide coordination for career and
technical student organizations' (CTSO) activities that are
an integral part of the instructional educational curriculum
for [career and technical education programs approved by the
department] department-approved CTSOs. Such [career and
technical organizations] CTSOs shall [include, but not be
limited to,] be the nationally recognized organizations of
DECA, FBLA, FFA, FCCLA, HOSA, PAS, SkillsUSA, and TSA. Any
other CTSO that meets the criteria defined by the department
of elementary and secondary education may be provided
staffing support subject to appropriation. Any CTSO
receiving staffing support under this subsection shall be an
agency of the state for purposes of sections 105.711 to
105.726 and 105.1070 to 105.1079.
2. The department of elementary and secondary
education shall handle the funds from the career and


technical student organizations, with department personnel
maintaining responsibility for the receipt and disbursement
of funds. The department may ensure accountability and
transparency by requiring the career and technical student
organizations to provide sworn affidavits annually by
personnel in the organization who are responsible for such
funds as to the proper receipt and disbursement of such
funds.
162.261. 1. The government and control of a seven-
director school district, other than an urban district, is
vested in a board of education of seven members, who hold
their office for three years, except as provided in sections
162.241 and 162.563, and until their successors are duly
elected and qualified. Any vacancy occurring in the board
shall be filled by the remaining members of the board;
except that if there are more than two vacancies at any one
time, the county commission upon receiving written notice of
the vacancies shall fill the vacancies by appointment. If
there are more than two vacancies at any one time in a
county without a county commission, the county executive
upon receiving written notice of the vacancies shall fill
the vacancies, with the advice and consent of the county
council, by appointment. The person appointed shall hold
office until the next municipal election, when a director
shall be elected for the unexpired term.
2. No seven-director, urban, or metropolitan school
district board of education shall hire a spouse of any
member of such board for a vacant or newly created position
unless the position has been advertised pursuant to board
policy and the superintendent of schools submits a written
recommendation for the employment of the spouse to the board
of education. The names of all applicants as well as the


name of the applicant hired for the position shall be
included in the board minutes.
3. The provisions of Article VII, Section 6 of the
Missouri Constitution apply to school districts.
4. Any school board member of a seven-director, urban,
or metropolitan school district in this state who by virtue
of office willfully and intentionally awards a contract for
goods or services to any relative within the third degree,
by consanguinity or affinity, may be subject to a fine of
five thousand dollars or ouster from office. The attorney
general or prosecuting or circuit attorney may bring a cause
of action in a court with proper jurisdiction to enforce
this subsection.
162.720. 1. (1) This subdivision shall apply to all
school years ending before July 1, 2024. Where a sufficient
number of children are identified as gifted and their
development requires programs or services beyond the level
of those ordinarily provided in regular public school
programs, districts may establish special programs for such
gifted children.
(2) For school year 2024-25 and all subsequent school
years, if three percent or more of students enrolled in a
school district are identified as gifted and their
development requires programs or services beyond the level
of those ordinarily provided in regular public school
programs, the district shall establish a state-approved
gifted program for gifted children.
2. For school year 2024-25 and all subsequent school
years, any teacher providing gifted services to students in
districts with an average daily attendance of more than
three hundred fifty students shall be certificated in gifted
education. In districts with an average daily attendance of
three hundred fifty students or fewer, any teacher providing


gifted services shall not be required to be certificated to
teach gifted education but such teacher shall annually
participate in at least six clock hours of professional
development focused on gifted services. The school district
shall pay for such professional development focused on
gifted services.
3. The state board of education shall determine
standards for such gifted programs and gifted services.
Approval of gifted programs shall be made by the state
department of elementary and secondary education based upon
project applications submitted at a time and in a form
determined by the department of elementary and secondary
education.
4. (1) For the 2027-28 school year and all subsequent
school years, each school district shall provide universal
screenings for all students at least once before the
beginning of grade three for the purpose of screening for
gifted students. Such screenings shall:
(a) Provide a body of current, valid, and reliable
evidence from a minimum of two areas including, but not
limited to:
a. General mental ability testing;
b. Academic achievement;
c. Creativity;
d. Reasoning;
e. Problem solving;
f. Parent, teacher, student, or self-referrals; and
g. Other evidence of gifts and talents; and
(b) Be reviewed by a minimum of three staff members
trained in gifted education, administration, or assessment,
or a combination of such areas for a referral for formal
gifted assessment.


(2) No district shall identify a child as gifted based
solely on the child's participation in an advanced placement
course or international baccalaureate course.
(3) Districts shall identify a child as gifted only if
the child meets the definition of gifted children as
provided in section 162.675.
(4) A child's failure to meet criteria on a single
screening or assessment tool shall not prevent further data
collection or consideration for gifted identification of
such child.
5. [Any district with a gifted education program
approved under subsection 3 of this section] For the 2026-27
school year and all subsequent school years, each school
district shall have a policy, approved by the board of
education of the district, that establishes a process:
(1) For the universal screening of students for gifted
program selection;
(2) For providing annual notification to parents and
guardians of such screening process;
(3) For identifying students for the gifted program
and notifying parents and guardians of the criteria the
district uses for the identification of students for the
gifted program, provided that such criteria shall be guided
by recommendations from the advisory council on the
education of gifted and talented children established under
section 161.249 and the standards established by the state
board of education; and
(4) That outlines the procedures and conditions under
which parents or guardians may request a review of the
decision that their child did not qualify to receive
services through the district's gifted education program.
6. School districts and school district employees
shall be immune from liability for any and all acts or


omissions relating to the decision that a child did not
qualify to receive services through the district's gifted
education program.
7. The department of elementary and secondary
education may promulgate all necessary rules and regulations
for the implementation and administration of this section.
Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in
section 536.010, that is created under the authority
delegated in this section shall become effective only if it
complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of
chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This
section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the
powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter
536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove
100 and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional,
101 then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed
102 or adopted after August 28, 2022, shall be invalid and void.
166.700. As used in sections 166.700 to 166.720, the
following terms mean:
(1) "Curriculum", a complete course of study for a
particular content area or grade level, including any
supplemental materials;
(2) "District", the same meaning as used in section
160.011;
(3) "Educational assistance organization", the same
meaning as used in section 135.712;
(4) "Illegal alien", any person who is not lawfully
present in the United States or any person who gained
illegal entry into the United States;
(5) "Parent", the same meaning as used in section
135.712;
(6) "Private school", a school that is not a part of
the public school system of the state of Missouri and that


charges tuition for the rendering of elementary or secondary
educational services;
(7) "Program", the same meaning as used in section
135.712;
(8) "Qualified school", an FPE school or any of the
following entities that is incorporated in Missouri and that
does not discriminate on the basis of race, color, or
national origin:
(a) A charter school as defined in section 160.400;
(b) A private school;
(c) A public school as defined in section 160.011; or
(d) A public or private virtual school;
(9) "Qualified student", any elementary or secondary
school student who is a resident of this state, who is not
an illegal alien, and who:
(a) Has an approved "individualized education plan"
(IEP) developed under the federal Individuals with
Disabilities Education Act (IDEA), 20 U.S.C. Section 1400 et
seq., as amended, in accordance with rules of the state
board of education or with the applicable rules of another
state, or who has been diagnosed with dyslexia, as the term
"dyslexia" is defined in section 633.420, by a licensed or
state-certified professional who is qualified by training
and experience to diagnose dyslexia and who is acting within
such professional's lawful scope of practice; or who has
received a diagnosis of a disability from a physician who is
licensed under chapter 334, a psychologist who is licensed
under chapter 337, or a mental health professional as
defined in section 632.005, while acting within such
individual's lawful scope of practice; or who has received a
diagnosis of a disability from a physician who holds an
active license issued by another state or territory of the


United States, the District of Columbia, or the Commonwealth
of Puerto Rico; or
(b) Is a member of a household whose total annual
income does not exceed an amount equal to three hundred
percent of the income standard used to qualify for free and
reduced price lunches, and that meets at least one of the
following qualifications:
a. Attended a public school as a full-time student for
at least one semester during the previous twelve months;
b. Is a child who is eligible to begin kindergarten or
first grade under sections 160.051 to 160.055; or
c. Is a sibling of a qualified student who received a
scholarship grant in the previous school year and will
receive a scholarship grant in the current school year.
166.705. 1. A parent of a qualified student may
establish a Missouri empowerment scholarship account for the
student by entering into a written agreement with an
educational assistance organization. The agreement shall
provide that:
(1) The qualified student shall enroll in a qualified
school and receive an education in at least the subjects of
English language arts, mathematics, social studies, and
science;
(2) Except for a qualified student who is in the
custody of the state, the qualified student shall not be
enrolled in a public school operated by, or a charter school
located within, the qualified student's district of
residence and shall release the district of residence from
all obligations to educate the qualified student while the
qualified student is enrolled in the program. This
subdivision shall not be construed to relieve the student's
district of residence from the obligation to conduct an
evaluation for disabilities;


(3) The qualified student shall receive a grant, in
the form of moneys deposited in accordance with section
135.714, in the qualified student's Missouri empowerment
scholarship account;
(4) The moneys deposited in the qualified student's
Missouri empowerment scholarship account shall be used only
for the following expenses of the qualified student:
(a) Tuition or fees at a qualified school;
(b) Textbooks required by a qualified school;
(c) Educational therapies or services from a licensed
or accredited practitioner or provider including, but not
limited to, licensed or accredited paraprofessionals or
educational aides;
(d) Tutoring services;
(e) Curriculum;
(f) Tuition or fees for a private virtual school;
(g) Fees for a nationally standardized norm-referenced
achievement test, advanced placement examinations,
international baccalaureate examinations, or any
examinations related to college or university admission;
(h) Fees for management of the Missouri empowerment
scholarship account by firms selected by the educational
assistance organization;
(i) Services provided by a public school including,
but not limited to, individual classes and extracurricular
programs;
(j) Computer hardware or other technological devices
that are used to help meet the qualified student's
educational needs and that are approved by an educational
assistance organization;
(k) Fees for summer education programs and specialized
after-school education programs;


(l) Transportation costs for mileage to and from a
qualified school; and
(5) Moneys deposited in the qualified student's
Missouri empowerment scholarship account shall not be used
for the following:
(a) Consumable educational supplies including, but not
limited to, paper, pens, pencils, or markers;
(b) Tuition at a private school located outside of the
state of Missouri; and
(c) Payments or reimbursements to any person related
within the third degree of consanguinity or affinity to a
qualified student.
2. Missouri empowerment scholarship accounts are
renewable on an annual basis upon request of the parent of a
qualified student. Notwithstanding any changes to the
qualified student's multidisciplinary evaluation team plan,
a student who has previously qualified for a Missouri
empowerment scholarship account shall remain eligible to
apply for renewal until the student completes high school
and submits scores to the [state treasurer] department of
elementary and secondary education from a nationally
standardized norm-referenced achievement test, advanced
placement examination, international baccalaureate
examination, or any examination related to college or
university admission purchased with Missouri empowerment
scholarship account funds.
3. A signed agreement under this section shall satisfy
the compulsory school attendance requirements of section
167.031.
4. A qualified school or a provider of services
purchased under this section shall not share, refund, or
rebate any Missouri empowerment scholarship account moneys
with the parent or qualified student in any manner.


5. If a qualified student withdraws from the program
by enrolling in a school other than a qualified school or is
disqualified from the program under the provisions of
section 166.710, the qualified student's Missouri
empowerment scholarship account shall be closed and any
remaining funds shall be returned to the educational
assistance organization for redistribution to other
qualified students. Under such circumstances, the
obligation to provide an education for such student shall
transfer back to the student's district of residence.
6. Any funds remaining in a qualified student's
Missouri empowerment scholarship account at the end of a
school year shall remain in the account and shall not be
returned to the educational assistance organization. Any
funds remaining in a qualified student's Missouri
100 empowerment scholarship account upon graduation from a
101 qualified school shall be returned to the educational
102 assistance organization for redistribution to other
103 qualified students.
104 7. Moneys received under sections 166.700 to 166.720
105 shall not constitute Missouri taxable income to the parent
106 of the qualified student.
166.710. 1. Beginning in the [2023-24] 2027-28 school
year and continuing thereafter, the state [treasurer]
auditor shall conduct or contract for annual audits, and may
conduct or contract for random and quarterly audits as
needed, of Missouri empowerment scholarship accounts to
ensure compliance with the requirements of subsection 1 of
section 166.705.
2. A parent, qualified student, or vendor may be
disqualified from program participation if the [state
treasurer] commissioner of education, or the [state
treasurer's] commissioner's designee, finds the party has


committed an intentional program violation consisting of any
misrepresentation or other act that materially violates any
law or rule governing the program. The [state treasurer]
department of elementary and secondary education may remove
any parent or qualified student from eligibility for a
Missouri empowerment scholarship account. A parent may
appeal the [state treasurer's] department's decision to the
administrative hearing commission. A parent may appeal the
administrative hearing commission's decision to the circuit
court of the county in which the student resides.
3. The [state treasurer] department of elementary and
secondary education may refer cases of substantial misuse of
moneys to the attorney general for investigation if the
[state treasurer] department of elementary and secondary
education obtains evidence of fraudulent use of an account.
4. The [state treasurer] department of elementary and
secondary education shall promulgate rules containing the
following to implement and administer the program:
(1) Procedures for conducting examinations of use of
account funds;
(2) Procedures for conducting random, quarterly, and
annual reviews of accounts;
(3) Creation of an online anonymous fraud reporting
service;
(4) Creation of an anonymous telephone hotline for
fraud reporting; and
(5) A surety bond requirement for educational
assistance organizations.
5. Any rules in effect on July 1, 2027, shall remain
in effect until repealed or modified by the department of
elementary and secondary education.
6. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
defined in section 536.010, that is created under the


authority delegated in this section shall become effective
only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
2021, shall be invalid and void.
166.715. 1. A person commits a class A misdemeanor if
the person is found to have knowingly used moneys granted
under section 135.714 for purposes other than those provided
for in sections 166.700 to 166.720.
2. No financial institution shall be liable in any
civil action for providing a scholarship account's financial
information to the [state treasurer] department of
elementary and secondary education unless the information
provided is false and the financial institution providing
the false information does so knowingly and with malice.
[620.484.] 173.2565. The provisions of the Wagner-
Peyser Act (29 U.S.C.A. Sec. 49 et seq.), as amended, are
hereby accepted by this state and the [division] office of
workforce development of the department of [economic] higher
education and workforce development is hereby designated and
constituted the agency of this state for the purposes of
said act. The [division] office shall establish and
maintain free public employment offices in such number and
in such places as may be necessary for the proper
administration of this chapter and for the purposes of
performing such functions as are within the purview of the
Wagner-Peyser Act.


[620.490.] 173.2566. The department of [economic]
higher education and workforce development shall promulgate
rules providing for the coordination of state and federal
job training resources administered by the department of
[economic] higher education and workforce development,
including the local workforce investment areas established
in the state to administer federal funds pursuant to the
federal Workforce [Investment] Innovation and Opportunity
Act (WIOA), Pub. L. 113-128, as amended, or its successor,
for the provision of assistance to businesses in this state
relating to the creation of new jobs in the state. The
department shall include in these rules the methods to be
followed by any business engaged in the creation of new jobs
in state to ensure that economically disadvantaged citizens
receive opportunities for employment in the new jobs
created. No rule or portion of a rule promulgated pursuant
to the authority of this section shall become effective
unless it has been promulgated pursuant to the provisions of
section 536.024.
[620.511.] 173.2570. 1. There is hereby established
the "Missouri Workforce Development Board", formerly known
as the Missouri workforce investment board, and hereinafter
referred to as "the board" in sections [620.511 to 620.513]
173.2570 to 173.2572.
2. The purpose of the board is to provide workforce
investment activities, through statewide and local workforce
investment systems, that increase the employment, retention,
and earnings of participants, and increase occupational
skill attainment by participants, and, as a result, improve
the quality of the workforce, reduce welfare dependency, and
enhance the productivity and competitiveness of the state of
Missouri. The board shall be the state's advisory board
pertaining to workforce preparation policy.


3. The board shall meet the requirements of the
federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act,
hereinafter referred to as the "WIOA", P.L. 113-128, as
amended. Should another federal law supplant the WIOA, all
references in sections [620.511 to 620.513] 173.2570 to
173.2572 to the WIOA shall apply as well to the new federal
law.
4. Composition of the board shall comply with the
WIOA. Board members appointed by the governor shall be
subject to the advice and consent of the senate. Consistent
with the requirements of the WIOA, the governor shall
designate one member of the board to be its chairperson.
5. Each member of the board shall serve for a term of
four years, subject to the pleasure of the governor, and
until a successor is duly appointed. In the event of a
vacancy on the board, the vacancy shall be filled in the
same manner as the original appointment and said replacement
shall serve the remainder of the original appointee's
unexpired term.
6. Of the members initially appointed to the WIOA,
formerly known as the WIA, board, one-fourth shall be
appointed for a term of four years, one-fourth shall be
appointed for a term of three years, one-fourth shall be
appointed for a term of two years, and one-fourth shall be
appointed for a term of one year.
7. WIOA board members shall receive no compensation,
but shall be reimbursed for all necessary expenses actually
incurred in the performance of their duties.
8. The department may include on its website a list of
the names of the members of the board, including the names
of members of local workforce development boards, along with
information on how to contact such boards.


[620.512.] 173.2571. 1. The board shall establish
bylaws governing its organization, operation, and procedure
consistent with sections [620.511 to 620.513] 173.2570 to
173.2572, and consistent with the WIOA.
2. The board shall meet at least four times each year
at the call of the chairperson.
3. In order to assure objective management and
oversight, the board shall not operate programs or provide
services directly to eligible participants, but shall exist
solely to plan, coordinate, and monitor the provisions of
such programs and services. A member of the board may not
vote on a matter under consideration by the board that
regards the provision of services by the member or by an
entity that the member represents or would provide direct
financial benefit to the member or the immediate family of
the member. A member of the board may not engage in any
other activity determined by the governor to constitute a
conflict of interest.
4. The composition and the roles and responsibilities
of the board membership may be amended to comply with any
succeeding federal or state legislative or regulatory
requirements governing workforce investment activities,
except that the procedure for such change shall be outlined
in state rules and regulations and adopted in the bylaws of
the board.
5. The department of [economic] higher education and
workforce development, office of workforce development,
shall provide professional, technical, and clerical staff
for the board.
6. The board may promulgate any rules and regulations
necessary to administer the provisions of sections [620.511
to 620.513] 173.2570 to 173.2572. Any rule or portion of a
rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is


created under the authority delegated in this section shall
become effective only if it complies with and is subject to
all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are
nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay
the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are
subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
August 28, 2007, shall be invalid and void.
[620.513.] 173.2572. 1. The board shall assist the
governor with the functions described in Section 101(d) of
the WIOA, 29 U.S.C. Section [311d] 3111(d), and any
regulations issued pursuant to the WIOA.
2. The board shall submit an annual report of its
activities to the governor, the speaker of the house of
representatives, and the president pro tem of the senate no
later than January thirty-first of each year.
3. Nothing in sections [620.511 to 620.513] 173.2570
to 173.2572 shall be construed to require or allow the board
to assume or supersede the statutory authority granted to,
or impose any duties or requirements on, the state
coordinating board for higher education, the governing
boards of the state's public colleges and universities, the
state board of education, or any local educational agencies.
174.300. 1. Prior to October 17, 1978, the governor
shall, with the advice and consent of the senate, appoint a
six-member board of regents to assume the general control
and management of Harris-Stowe College. The members of the
board shall serve for terms of six years each, except for
the members first appointed, two of whom shall serve two-
year terms, two of whom shall serve four-year terms, and two
of whom shall serve six-year terms. Not more than three of


the regents shall be affiliated with any one political party
or reside in the city in which the institution's principal
administrative office is located.
2. On and after August 28, 2005, Harris-Stowe State
College shall be known as Harris-Stowe State University, and
the provisions contained in subsection 1 of this section
shall continue to apply to the institution.
174.332. 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of section
174.050 to the contrary, the board of regents of Northwest
Missouri State University shall be composed of nine members,
eight of whom shall be voting members and one who shall be a
nonvoting member. Not more than four voting members shall
belong to any one political party[. Not more than two
voting members shall be residents of the same county. The
appointed members of the board serving on August 28, 2008,
shall continue to serve until the expiration of the terms
for which the appointed members were appointed and until
such time a successor is duly appointed.
2. The board of regents shall be appointed as follows:
(1) Six voting members shall be residents of the
university's historic statutory service region, provided at
least one member shall be a resident of Nodaway County. For
the sole purpose of determining the composition of the board
of regents, the university's historic statutory service
region shall consist of the counties of Atchison, Andrew,
Caldwell, Carroll, Clay, Clinton, Daviess, DeKalb, Gentry,
Grundy, Harrison, Holt, Livingston, Mercer, Nodaway, Ray,
and Worth;
(2) Two voting members shall be residents of a county
in the state that is outside the university's historic
statutory service region, as described in subdivision (1) of
this subsection, provided these two members shall not be
appointed from the same congressional district; and


(3)] or reside in the county in which the institution's
principal administrative office is located. One nonvoting
member shall be a full-time student of the university, a
United States citizen, and a resident of Missouri.
[3.] 2. A majority of the voting members of the board
shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business;
however, no appropriation of money nor any contract that
shall require any appropriation or disbursement of money
shall be made, nor teacher employed or dismissed, unless a
majority of the voting members of the board vote for the
same.
[4.] 3. Except as specifically provided in this
section, the appointments and terms of office for the voting
and nonvoting members of the board, and all other duties and
responsibilities of the board, shall comply with the
provisions of state law regarding boards of regents.
174.450. 1. Except as provided in subsections 2, [6]
3, and [7] 4 of this section, the governing board of the
University of Central Missouri, Missouri State University,
Missouri Southern State University, Missouri Western State
University, and of each other public institution of higher
education which, through the procedures established in
subdivision (8) or (9) of section 173.030, is charged with a
statewide mission shall be a board of governors consisting
of eight members, composed of seven voting members and one
nonvoting member as provided in sections 174.453 and
174.455, who shall be appointed by the governor of Missouri,
by and with the advice and consent of the senate. No person
shall be appointed a voting member who is not a citizen of
the United States and who has not been a resident of the
state of Missouri for at least two years immediately prior
to such appointment. Not more than four voting members
shall belong to any one political party. The appointed


members of the board of regents serving on the date of the
statutory mission change shall become members of the board
of governors on the effective date of the statutory mission
change and serve until the expiration of the terms for which
such members were appointed. The board of regents of any
such institution shall be abolished on the effective date of
the statutory mission change, as prescribed in subdivision
(8) or (9) of section 173.030.
2. The governing board of Missouri State University, a
public institution of higher education charged with a
statewide mission in public affairs, shall be a board of
governors of ten members, composed of nine voting members
and one nonvoting member, who shall be appointed by the
governor, by and with the advice and consent of the senate.
The nonvoting member shall be a student selected in the same
manner as prescribed in section 174.055. [At least one but
no more than two voting members shall be appointed to the
board from each congressional district, and] Of the nine
voting members appointed to the board, no fewer than seven
members shall each be residents of different congressional
districts of this state; provided that no more than one
member shall be appointed from any one congressional
district. In addition to the seven members appointed to
represent different congressional districts, two members
shall be appointed at-large and shall not be required to
reside in a congressional district not otherwise represented
on the board. Every member of the board shall be a citizen
of the United States, and a resident of this state for at
least two years prior to the member's appointment. No more
than five voting members shall belong to any one political
party. The term of office of the governors shall be six
years, except as provided in this subsection. The term of


office for those appointed hereafter shall end January first
in years ending in an odd number.
3. [If a voting member of the board of governors of
Missouri State University is found by unanimous vote of the
other governors to have moved such governor's residence from
the district from which such governor was appointed, then
the office of such governor shall be forfeited and
considered vacant.
4. Should the total number of Missouri congressional
districts be altered, all members of the board of governors
of Missouri State University shall be allowed to serve the
remainder of the term for which such members were appointed.
5. Should the boundaries of any congressional
districts be altered in a manner that displaces a member of
the board of governors of Missouri State University from the
congressional district from which the member was appointed,
the member shall be allowed to serve the remainder of the
term for which the member was appointed.
6.] The governing board of Missouri Southern State
University shall be a board of governors consisting of nine
members, composed of eight voting members and one nonvoting
member as provided in sections 174.453 and 174.455, who
shall be appointed by the governor of Missouri, by and with
the advice and consent of the senate. No person shall be
appointed a voting member who is not a citizen of the United
States and who has not been a resident of the state of
Missouri for at least two years immediately prior to such
appointment. Not more than four voting members shall belong
to any one political party or reside in the county in which
the institution's principal administrative office is located.
[7.] 4. The governing board of Northwest Missouri
State University shall be a board of regents as provided in
section 174.332.


5. Not more than three voting members of the governing
board of the University of Central Missouri shall reside in
the county in which the institution's principal
administrative office is located.
174.453. 1. Except as provided in section 174.450 and
in [subsection] subsections 4, 5, and 6 of this section, the
board of governors shall be appointed as follows:
(1) Five voting members shall be selected from the
counties comprising the institution's historic statutory
service region as described in section 174.010, except that
no more than two members shall be appointed from any one
county with a population of less than two hundred thousand
inhabitants;
(2) Two voting members shall be selected from any of
the counties in the state which are outside of the
institution's historic service region; and
(3) One nonvoting member who is a student shall be
selected in the same manner as prescribed in section 174.055.
2. The term of service of the governors shall be as
follows:
(1) The voting members shall be appointed for terms of
six years; and
(2) The nonvoting student member shall serve a two-
year term.
3. Members of any board of governors selected pursuant
to this section and in office on May 13, 1999, shall serve
the remainder of their unexpired terms.
4. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 1 of
this section, the board of governors of Missouri Southern
State University shall be appointed as follows:
(1) [Six voting members shall be selected from any of
the following counties: Barton, Jasper, Newton, McDonald,


Dade, Lawrence, and Barry provided that no more than three
of these six members shall be appointed from any one county;
(2) Two voting members shall be selected from any of
the counties in the state which are outside of the counties
articulated in subdivision (1) of this subsection;
(3)] Not more than four voting members shall be
selected who reside in the county in which the institution's
principal administrative office is located; and
(2) One nonvoting member who is a student shall be
selected in the same manner as prescribed in section
174.055[; and
(4) The provisions of subdivisions (1) and (2) of this
subsection shall only apply to board members first appointed
after August 28, 2004].
5. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 1 of
this section, the board of governors of Missouri Western
State University shall be composed of eight members
appointed as follows:
(1) Five voting members shall be selected from any of
the following counties: Buchanan, Platte, Clinton, Andrew,
and DeKalb;
(2) One nonvoting member who is a student shall be
selected in the same manner as prescribed in section
174.055; and
(3) The provisions of subdivisions (1) and (2) of this
subsection shall only apply to board members first appointed
after August 28, 2005.
6. [(1)] Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection
1 of this section to the contrary, the board of governors of
Southeast Missouri State University shall be appointed as
follows:


[(a) Two voting members shall be selected from any of
the following counties: Butler, Dunklin, Mississippi, New
Madrid, Pemiscot, Scott, or Stoddard;
(b) Two voting members shall be selected from any of
the following counties: Bollinger, Cape Girardeau, Madison,
Perry, Ste. Genevieve, or St. Francois;
(c) Two voting members shall be selected from any of
the following counties or areas: Franklin, Jefferson,
Lincoln, St. Charles, St. Louis, St. Louis City, or Warren;
(d) One voting member shall be selected from one of
the counties in the state; and
(e)] (1) Seven voting members shall be selected, not
more than three of whom shall reside in the county in which
the institution's principal administrative office is
located; and
(2) One nonvoting member who is a student shall be
selected in the same manner as provided in section 174.055.
[(2) The provisions of paragraphs (a) to (c) of
subdivision (1) of this subsection shall only apply to board
members first appointed after August 28, 2021.]
174.610. The governing board of the Truman State
University shall be a board of governors consisting of ten
members, composed of seven voting members and three
nonvoting members as provided in section 174.620, who shall
be appointed by the governor of Missouri, by and with the
advice and consent of the senate. No person shall be
appointed a voting governor who is not a citizen of the
United States and who has not been a resident of the state
of Missouri for at least two years immediately prior to such
person's appointment. Not more than four voting governors
shall belong to any one political party. Not more than
three voting governors shall reside in the county in which
the institution's principal administrative office is


located. The appointed members of the board of regents
serving on January 1, 1986, shall become members of the
board of governors on January 1, 1986, and serve until the
expiration of the terms for which they were appointed.
175.020. The board of curators of Lincoln University
of Missouri shall hereafter consist of nine members who
shall be appointed by the governor, by and with the advice
and consent of the senate. No person shall be appointed a
curator who shall not be a citizen of the United States and
who shall not have been a resident of the state of Missouri
two years next prior to his or her appointment. Not more
than five curators shall belong to any one political party,
and not more than four curators shall reside in the county
in which the institution's principal administrative office
is located.
178.530. 1. The state board of education shall
establish standards and annually inspect, as a basis for
approval, all public prevocational, vocational schools,
State Technical College of Missouri, departments and classes
receiving state or federal moneys for giving training in
agriculture, industrial, home economics and commercial
subjects and all schools, departments and classes receiving
state or federal moneys for the preparation of teachers and
supervisors of such subjects. The public prevocational and
vocational schools, State Technical College of Missouri,
departments, and classes, and the training schools,
departments and classes are entitled to the state or federal
moneys so long as they are approved by the state board of
education, as to site, plant, equipment, qualifications of
teachers, admission of pupils, courses of study and methods
of instruction. All disbursements of state or federal
moneys for the benefit of the approved prevocational and
vocational schools, State Technical College of Missouri,


departments and classes shall be made semiannually. The
school board of each approved school or the governing body
of State Technical College of Missouri shall file a report
with the state board of education at the times and in the
form that the state board requires. Upon receipt of a
satisfactory report, the state board of education shall
certify to the commissioner of administration for [his] the
commissioner's approval the amount of the state and federal
moneys due the school district or State Technical College of
Missouri. The amount due the school district shall be
certified by the commissioner of administration and proper
warrant therefor shall be issued to the district treasurer
or State Technical College of Missouri.
2. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 1 of
this section, the state board of education shall establish
standards for agricultural education that may be adopted by
a private school accredited by an agency recognized by the
United States Department of Education as an accreditor of
private schools that wishes to provide quality vocational
programming outside the requirements of, but consistent
with, the federal Vocational Education Act. Such standards
shall be sufficient to qualify a private school to apply to
the state chapter for approval of a local chapter of a
federally chartered national agricultural education
association on a form developed for that purpose by the
department of elementary and secondary education without
eligibility to receive state or federal funding for
agricultural vocational education. The provisions of this
subsection shall not be construed to create eligibility for
a private school to receive state or federal funding for
agricultural vocational education, but shall not prohibit a
private school from receiving state or federal funds for
which such private school would otherwise be eligible for


agricultural vocational education. Any such private school
shall reimburse the department annually for the cost of
oversight and maintenance of the program.
3. (1) The department of elementary and secondary
education, through its agricultural education section, shall
be authorized to establish a [pilot] program, beginning in
the [2020-21] 2027-28 school year, to provide for
agricultural education in elementary schools in the state.
[The purpose of the pilot program shall be to determine
whether and how to implement an elementary agricultural
education program statewide.]
(2) (a) The department, through its employees who
work in the agricultural education section, [is authorized
to select from among applications submitted by the public
elementary schools a minimum of sixteen public elementary
schools for participation in the pilot program. The
department] shall develop [an application] a process for
public elementary schools to [apply to] participate in the
[pilot] program.
(b) The local school board for each elementary school
[selected] that elects to be in the [pilot] program shall
agree to implement and fully fund an elementary agricultural
education program in such school and [to continue to provide
such elementary agricultural education program for a period
no shorter than three years. The local school district] may
employ an agricultural education teacher to provide such
program for the elementary school.
(3) The department, through its employees who work in
the agricultural education section, [and local school
districts] shall [collaborate to] establish [the]
instructional [model] models for [each] the elementary
agricultural education program in conjunction and
collaboration with Missouri agricultural commodity groups


and organizations that promote and support Missouri
agriculture. Such instructional [model] models shall be
grade-appropriate and include instruction in an organized
classroom, collaborative learning experiences through
investigation and inquiry, including laboratory and site-
based learning activities, and personal, leadership, and
career development opportunities.
(4) The department, through its agricultural education
section, shall provide for a program evaluation regarding
the success and impact of the [pilot] program [upon
completion of the third year of the pilot program] and shall
report the results of such evaluation [to the relevant house
and senate committees on agriculture and education] on the
department's website.
4. The department shall maintain an adequate number of
100 full-time employees, certified in agricultural education and
101 distributed regionally throughout the state, to provide
102 accountability for program delivery of agricultural
103 education, to continue to develop and maintain pertinent
104 agricultural education instructional models and standards,
105 to assist local school districts on matters related to
106 agricultural education, and to coordinate regional and
107 statewide activities supporting K-12 agricultural education
108 programming.
109 5. Nothing in this section shall be construed to
110 require public elementary schools to participate in the
111 [pilot] program.
112 6. The requirements of section 160.514 shall not apply
113 to the provisions of this section.
178.550. 1. This section shall be known and may be
cited as the "Career and Technical Education Student
Protection Act". There is hereby established the "Career


and Technical Education Advisory Council" within the
department of elementary and secondary education.
2. The advisory council shall be composed of [sixteen
members who shall be] Missouri residents. The director of
the department of economic development and the commissioner
of higher education, or [his or her designee] their
designees, shall be [a member] members. The commissioner of
education, in collaboration with appropriate stakeholders,
shall appoint the following members:
(1) A director or administrator of a career and
technical education center;
(2) [An individual from the business community with a
background in commerce] Four individuals from business and
commerce;
(3) A representative from State Technical College of
Missouri;
(4) Three current or retired career and technical
education teachers who also serve or served as an advisor to
any of the nationally recognized career and technical
education student organizations of:
(a) DECA;
(b) Future Business Leaders of America (FBLA);
(c) FFA;
(d) Family, Career and Community Leaders of America
(FCCLA);
(e) [Health Occupations Students of America (HOSA)]
HOSA-Future Health Professionals;
(f) SkillsUSA; or
(g) Technology Student Association (TSA);
(5) A representative from a business organization,
association of businesses, or a business coalition;
(6) A representative from a Missouri community college;


(7) A representative from [Southeast Missouri State
University or the University of Central] a Missouri four-
year college or university;
(8) An individual participating in an apprenticeship
recognized by the department of labor and industrial
relations or approved by the United States Department of
Labor's Office of Apprenticeship;
(9) A school administrator or school superintendent of
a school that offers career and technical education; and
(10) A student-services representative, who may serve
in a school counseling or career resource educator position.
3. Members appointed by the commissioner of education
shall serve a term of [five] three years [except for the
initial appointments, which shall be for the following
lengths:
(1) One member shall be appointed for a term of one
year;
(2) Two members shall be appointed for a term of two
years;
(3) Two members shall be appointed for a term of three
years;
(4) Three members shall be appointed for a term of
four years;
(5) Three members shall be appointed for a term of
five years] and shall serve no more than two terms.
4. Four members shall be from the general assembly.
The president pro tempore of the senate shall appoint two
members of the senate of whom not more than one shall be of
the same party. The speaker of the house of representatives
shall appoint two members of the house of representatives of
whom not more than one shall be of the same party. The
legislative members shall serve on the advisory council


until such time as they resign, are no longer members of the
general assembly, or are replaced by new appointments.
5. The advisory council shall have [three] nonvoting
ex officio members[:
(1) A director of guidance and counseling services at
the department of elementary and secondary education, or a
similar position if such position ceases to exist;
(2) The director of the division of workforce
development; and
(3) A member of the coordinating board for higher
education, as selected by the coordinating board], all of
whom shall be employees of the department of elementary and
secondary education selected by the commissioner of
education.
6. The assistant commissioner for the office of
college and career readiness of the department of elementary
and secondary education shall provide staff assistance to
the advisory council.
7. The advisory council shall meet at least [four] two
times annually. The advisory council may make all rules it
deems necessary to enable it to conduct its meetings, elect
its officers, and set the terms and duties of its officers.
The advisory council shall elect from among its members a
[chairperson] chair, vice [chairperson] chair, a secretary-
reporter, and such other officers as it deems necessary.
Members of the advisory council shall serve without
compensation but may be reimbursed for actual expenses
necessary to the performance of their official duties for
the advisory council.
8. Any business to come before the advisory council
shall be available on the advisory council's internet
website [at least seven business days prior to the start of
100 each meeting] as provided under section 610.020. All


101 records of any decisions, votes, exhibits, or outcomes shall
102 be available on the advisory council's internet website
103 within forty-eight hours following the conclusion of every
104 meeting. [Any materials prepared for the members shall be
105 delivered to the members at least five days before the
106 meeting, and to the extent such materials are public records
107 as defined in section 610.010 and are not permitted to be
108 closed under section 610.021, shall be made available on the
109 advisory council's internet website at least five business
110 days in advance of the meeting.
111 9. The advisory council shall make an annual written
112 report to the state board of education and the commissioner
113 of education regarding the development, implementation, and
114 administration of the state budget for career and technical
115 education.
116 10. The advisory council shall annually submit written
117 recommendations to the state board of education and the
118 commissioner of education regarding the oversight and
119 procedures for the handling of funds for student career and
120 technical education organizations.
121 11.] 9. The advisory council shall:
122 (1) Develop a comprehensive statewide short- and long-
123 range strategic plan for career and technical education;
124 (2) Identify service gaps and provide advice on
125 methods to close such gaps as they relate to youth and adult
126 employees, workforce development, and employers on training
127 needs;
128 (3) Confer with public and private entities for the
129 purpose of promoting and improving career and technical
130 education;
131 (4) Identify legislative recommendations to improve
132 career and technical education;


133 (5) Promote coordination of existing career and
134 technical education programs;
135 (6) Adopt, alter, or repeal by its own bylaws, rules
136 and regulations governing the manner in which its business
137 may be transacted.
138 [12.] 10. For purposes of this section, the department
139 of elementary and secondary education shall provide such
140 documentation and information as to allow the advisory
141 council to be effective.
142 [13.] 11. For purposes of this section, "advisory
143 council" shall mean the career and technical education
144 advisory council.
178.585. 1. Under rules and regulations of the state
board of education, the commissioner of education, in
cooperation with the [director of the division] office of
workforce development of the department of [economic] higher
education and workforce development, shall establish
procedures to provide grants to public high schools,
vocational-technical schools, State Technical College of
Missouri, and community colleges solely for the purpose of
new programs, curriculum enhancement, equipment and
facilities so as to upgrade vocational and technical
education in the state.
2. Each vocational-technical school, community
college, State Technical College of Missouri, and school
district of any public high school receiving a grant
authorized by this section shall have an advisory committee
composed of local business persons, labor leaders, parents,
senior citizens, community leaders and teachers to establish
a plan to ensure that students who graduate from the
vocational-technical school, community college, State
Technical College of Missouri, or public high school proceed


to a four-year college or high-wage job with workplace-skill
development opportunities.
3. The [director of the] department of [economic]
higher education and workforce development shall provide
annually to the commissioner of education a listing of
demand occupations in the state including substate
projections. The listing shall include those occupations
for which, in the judgment of the [director of the]
department of [economic] higher education and workforce
development, there is a critical shortage to meet present or
future employment needs necessary to the economic growth and
competitiveness of the state.
4. In any fiscal year, at least seventy-five percent
of all moneys for the grant awards authorized by this
section shall be to public high schools, vocational-
technical schools, State Technical College of Missouri, or
community colleges for new programs, curriculum enhancement
or equipment necessary to address demand occupations
identified pursuant to subsection 3 of this section.
178.632. The governing board of State Technical
College of Missouri shall be a board of regents composed of
seven voting members and one nonvoting student member. Such
members shall be appointed by the governor with the advice
and consent of the senate after August 28, 1995, and after
the conditions of section 178.631 are satisfied. No person
shall be appointed to the board who is not a citizen of the
United States and who has not been a resident of the state
of Missouri for at least two years immediately prior to his
appointment. Not less than three voting members shall
belong to one of the two major political parties and not
less than three shall belong to the other major political
party. Not more than [two voting members shall reside in
Osage County or other immediately contiguous counties] three


voting members shall reside in the county in which the
institution's principal administrative office is located.
186.019. 1. Prior to April first of each year,
starting in 1992, the information described in subdivisions
(1), (2), (3) and (4) of this subsection shall be delivered
in report form to the Missouri women's council, the
governor's office, the secretary of the senate, and the
chief clerk of the house of representatives. The
information shall apply only to activities which occurred
during the previous calendar year. Reports shall be
required from the following:
(1) The department of labor and industrial relations,
and the [division] office of workforce development of the
department of [economic] higher education and workforce
development, who shall assemble all available data and
report on all business start-ups and business failures which
are fifty-one percent or more owned by women. The reports
shall distinguish, as best as possible, those businesses
which are sole proprietorships, partnerships, or
corporations;
(2) The department of economic development, who shall
assemble all available data and report on financial
assistance or other incentives given to all businesses which
are fifty-one percent or more owned by women. The report
shall contain information relating to assistance or
incentives awarded for the retention of existing businesses,
the expansion of existing businesses, or the start-up of new
businesses;
(3) The department of revenue, who shall assemble all
available data and report on the number, gross receipts and
net income of all businesses which are fifty-one percent or
more owned by women. The reports shall distinguish those


businesses which are sole proprietorships, partnerships or
corporations;
(4) The division of purchasing of the office of
administration, who shall assemble all available data and
report on businesses which are fifty-one percent or more
owned by women which are recipients of contracts awarded by
the state of Missouri.
2. Prior to December first of each year, starting in
1990, the information described in subdivisions (1) and (2)
of this subsection shall be delivered in report form to the
Missouri women's council, the governor's office, the
secretary of the senate, and the chief clerk of the house of
representatives. The information shall apply only to
activities which occurred during the previous school year.
Reports shall be required from the following:
(1) The department of elementary and secondary
education shall assemble all available data from the
Vocational and Education Data System (VEDS) on class
enrollments by Instruction Program Codes (CIP); by secondary
and postsecondary schools; and, secondary, postsecondary,
and adult level classes; and by gender. This data shall
also be reported by classes of traditional and
nontraditional occupational areas;
(2) The coordinating board for higher education shall
assemble all available data and report on higher education
degrees awarded by academic discipline; type of degree; type
of school; and gender. All available data shall also be
reported on salaries received upon completion of degree
program and subsequent hire, as well as any data available
on follow-up salaries.
[210.1700. 1. As used in this section,
the following terms mean:
(1) "Overnight camp", a program operated
by a person or organization that includes the


hours between 9:00 p.m. and 6:00 a.m. but not
for two or more sequential overnights;
(2) "Residential camp", a program operated
by a person or organization that includes the
hours between 9:00 p.m. and 6:00 a.m. for two or
more sequential overnights.
2. Each overnight camp or residential camp
staff member or volunteer who is eighteen years
of age or older shall have received a qualifying
criminal background check as defined in
210.1080.]
210.1700. 1. As used in this section, "residential
camp" means a program operated by a person or organization
that includes the hours between 9:00 p.m. and 6:00 a.m. for
two or more sequential overnights.
2. Each residential camp staff member or volunteer who
is eighteen years of age or older shall be subject to a
criminal background check prior to commencing employment or
volunteer service. Such criminal background check shall
include:
(1) A search of the National Crime Information
Center's National Sex Offender Registry; and
(2) A search of the following data sources in Missouri
and each state where such staff member or volunteer has
resided during the preceding five years, where such data
sources are available:
(a) The state name-based criminal registry or
repository; and
(b) The state name-based sex offender registry or
repository.
3. Upon completion of the background check, any staff
member or volunteer who is eighteen years of age or older
shall be ineligible for employment or service if such person:
(a) Is registered, or is required to be registered, on
a state sex offender registry or repository or the National
Sex Offender Registry; or


(b) Has pled guilty or nolo contendere to or been
found guilty of any of the offenses listed in paragraphs (a)
to (k) of subdivision (5) of subsection 4 of section
210.1080 or any similar offense in any federal, state,
municipal, or other court of similar jurisdiction of which
the camp has knowledge.
288.040. 1. A claimant who is unemployed and has been
determined to be an insured worker shall be eligible for
benefits for any week only if the deputy finds that:
(1) The claimant has registered for work at and
thereafter has continued to report at an employment office
in accordance with such regulations as the division may
prescribe;
(2) The claimant is able to work and is available for
work. No person shall be deemed available for work unless
such person has been and is actively and earnestly seeking
work. Upon the filing of an initial or renewed claim, and
prior to the filing of each weekly claim thereafter, the
deputy shall notify each claimant of the number of work
search contacts required to constitute an active search for
work. Unless the deputy directs otherwise, a claimant shall
make a minimum of three work search contacts during any week
for which he or she claims benefits. No person shall be
considered not available for work, pursuant to this
subdivision, solely because he or she is a substitute
teacher or is on jury duty. A claimant shall not be
determined to be ineligible pursuant to this subdivision
because of not actively and earnestly seeking work if:
(a) The claimant is participating in training approved
pursuant to Section 236 of the Trade Act of 1974, as
amended, (19 U.S.C.A. Sec. 2296, as amended);
(b) The claimant is temporarily unemployed through no
fault of his or her own and has a definite recall date


within eight weeks of his or her first day of unemployment;
however, upon application of the employer responsible for
the claimant's unemployment, such eight-week period may be
extended not to exceed a total of sixteen weeks at the
discretion of the director;
(3) The claimant has reported to an office of the
division as directed by the deputy, but at least once every
four weeks, except that a claimant shall be exempted from
the reporting requirement of this subdivision if:
(a) The claimant is claiming benefits in accordance
with division regulations dealing with partial or temporary
total unemployment; or
(b) The claimant is temporarily unemployed through no
fault of his or her own and has a definite recall date
within eight weeks of his or her first day of unemployment;
or
(c) The director of the division of employment
security has determined that the claimant belongs to a group
or class of workers whose opportunities for reemployment
will not be enhanced by reporting, or is prevented from
reporting due to emergency conditions that limit access by
the general public to an office that serves the area where
the claimant resides, but only during the time such
circumstances exist.
Ineligibility pursuant to this subdivision shall begin
on the first day of the week which the claimant was
scheduled to claim and shall end on the last day of the week
preceding the week during which the claimant does report to
the division's office;
(4) Prior to the first week of a period of total or
partial unemployment for which the claimant claims benefits
he or she has been totally or partially unemployed for a
waiting period of one week. No more than one waiting week


will be required in any benefit year. During calendar year
2008 and each calendar year thereafter, the one-week waiting
period shall become compensable once his or her remaining
balance on the claim is equal to or less than the
compensable amount for the waiting period. No week shall be
counted as a week of total or partial unemployment for the
purposes of this subsection unless it occurs within the
benefit year which includes the week with respect to which
the claimant claims benefits;
(5) The claimant has made a claim for benefits within
fourteen days from the last day of the week being claimed.
The fourteen-day period may, for good cause, be extended to
twenty-eight days;
(6) The claimant has reported to an employment office
to participate in a reemployment assessment and reemployment
services as directed by the deputy or designated staff of an
employment office, unless the deputy determines that good
cause exists for the claimant's failure to participate in
such reemployment assessment and reemployment services. For
purposes of this section, "reemployment services" may
include, but not be limited to, the following:
(a) Providing an orientation to employment office
services;
(b) Providing job search assistance; and
(c) Providing labor market statistics or analysis;
Ineligibility under this subdivision shall begin on the
first day of the week which the claimant was scheduled to
report for the reemployment assessment or reemployment
services and shall end on the last day of the week preceding
the week during which the claimant does report in person to
the employment office for such reemployment assessment or
reemployment services;


(7) The claimant is participating in reemployment
services, such as job search assistance services, as
directed by the deputy if the claimant has been determined
to be likely to exhaust regular benefits and to need
reemployment services pursuant to a profiling system
established by the division, unless the deputy determines
that:
100 (a) The individual has completed such reemployment
101 services; or
102 (b) There is justifiable cause for the claimant's
103 failure to participate in such reemployment services.
104 2. A claimant shall be ineligible for waiting week
105 credit or benefits for any week for which the deputy finds
106 he or she is or has been suspended by his or her most recent
107 employer for misconduct connected with his or her work.
108 Suspensions of four weeks or more shall be treated as
109 discharges.
110 3. (1) Benefits based on "service in employment",
111 described in subsections 7 and 8 of section 288.034, shall
112 be payable in the same amount, on the same terms and subject
113 to the same conditions as compensation payable on the basis
114 of other service subject to this law; except that:
115 (a) With respect to service performed in an
116 instructional, research, or principal administrative
117 capacity for an educational institution, benefits shall not
118 be paid based on such services for any week of unemployment
119 commencing during the period between two successive academic
120 years or terms, or during a similar period between two
121 regular but not successive terms, or during a period of paid
122 sabbatical leave provided for in the individual's contract,
123 to any individual if such individual performs such services
124 in the first of such academic years (or terms) and if there
125 is a contract or a reasonable assurance that such individual


126 will perform services in any such capacity for any
127 educational institution in the second of such academic years
128 or terms;
129 (b) With respect to services performed in any capacity
130 (other than instructional, research, or principal
131 administrative capacity) for an educational institution,
132 benefits shall not be paid on the basis of such services to
133 any individual for any week which commences during a period
134 between two successive academic years or terms if such
135 individual performs such services in the first of such
136 academic years or terms and there is a contract or a
137 reasonable assurance that such individual will perform such
138 services in the second of such academic years or terms;
139 (c) With respect to services described in paragraphs
140 (a) and (b) of this subdivision, benefits shall not be paid
141 on the basis of such services to any individual for any week
142 which commences during an established and customary vacation
143 period or holiday recess if such individual performed such
144 services in the period immediately before such vacation
145 period or holiday recess, and there is reasonable assurance
146 that such individual will perform such services immediately
147 following such vacation period or holiday recess;
148 (d) With respect to services described in paragraphs
149 (a) and (b) of this subdivision, benefits payable on the
150 basis of services in any such capacity shall be denied as
151 specified in paragraphs (a), (b), and (c) of this
152 subdivision to any individual who performed such services at
153 an educational institution while in the employ of an
154 educational service agency, and for this purpose the term
155 "educational service agency" means a governmental agency or
156 governmental entity which is established and operated
157 exclusively for the purpose of providing such services to
158 one or more educational institutions.


159 (2) If compensation is denied for any week pursuant to
160 paragraph (b) or (d) of subdivision (1) of this subsection
161 to any individual performing services at an educational
162 institution in any capacity (other than instructional,
163 research or principal administrative capacity), and such
164 individual was not offered an opportunity to perform such
165 services for the second of such academic years or terms,
166 such individual shall be entitled to a retroactive payment
167 of the compensation for each week for which the individual
168 filed a timely claim for compensation and for which
169 compensation was denied solely by reason of paragraph (b) or
170 (d) of subdivision (1) of this subsection.
171 4. (1) A claimant shall be ineligible for waiting
172 week credit, benefits or shared work benefits for any week
173 for which he or she is receiving or has received
174 remuneration exceeding his or her weekly benefit amount or
175 shared work benefit amount in the form of:
176 (a) Compensation for temporary partial disability
177 pursuant to the workers' compensation law of any state or
178 pursuant to a similar law of the United States;
179 (b) A governmental or other pension, retirement or
180 retired pay, annuity, or other similar periodic payment
181 which is based on the previous work of such claimant to the
182 extent that such payment is provided from funds provided by
183 a base period or chargeable employer pursuant to a plan
184 maintained or contributed to by such employer; but, except
185 for such payments made pursuant to the Social Security Act
186 or the Railroad Retirement Act of 1974 (or the corresponding
187 provisions of prior law), the provisions of this paragraph
188 shall not apply if the services performed for such employer
189 by the claimant after the beginning of the base period (or
190 remuneration for such services) do not affect eligibility


191 for or increase the amount of such pension, retirement or
192 retired pay, annuity or similar payment.
193 (2) If the remuneration referred to in this subsection
194 is less than the benefits which would otherwise be due, the
195 claimant shall be entitled to receive for such week, if
196 otherwise eligible, benefits reduced by the amount of such
197 remuneration, and, if such benefit is not a multiple of one
198 dollar, such amount shall be lowered to the next multiple of
199 one dollar.
200 (3) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivisions (1)
201 and (2) of this subsection, if a claimant has contributed in
202 any way to the Social Security Act or the Railroad
203 Retirement Act of 1974, or the corresponding provisions of
204 prior law, no part of the payments received pursuant to such
205 federal law shall be deductible from the amount of benefits
206 received pursuant to this chapter.
207 5. A claimant shall be ineligible for waiting week
208 credit or benefits for any week for which or a part of which
209 he or she has received or is seeking unemployment benefits
210 pursuant to an unemployment insurance law of another state
211 or the United States; provided, that if it be finally
212 determined that the claimant is not entitled to such
213 unemployment benefits, such ineligibility shall not apply.
214 6. (1) A claimant shall be ineligible for waiting
215 week credit or benefits for any week for which the deputy
216 finds that such claimant's total or partial unemployment is
217 due to a stoppage of work which exists because of a labor
218 dispute in the factory, establishment or other premises in
219 which such claimant is or was last employed. In the event
220 the claimant secures other employment from which he or she
221 is separated during the existence of the labor dispute, the
222 claimant must have obtained bona fide employment as a
223 permanent employee for at least the major part of each of


224 two weeks in such subsequent employment to terminate his or
225 her ineligibility. If, in any case, separate branches of
226 work which are commonly conducted as separate businesses at
227 separate premises are conducted in separate departments of
228 the same premises, each such department shall for the
229 purposes of this subsection be deemed to be a separate
230 factory, establishment or other premises. This subsection
231 shall not apply if it is shown to the satisfaction of the
232 deputy that:
233 (a) The claimant is not participating in or financing
234 or directly interested in the labor dispute which caused the
235 stoppage of work; and
236 (b) The claimant does not belong to a grade or class
237 of workers of which, immediately preceding the commencement
238 of the stoppage, there were members employed at the premises
239 at which the stoppage occurs, any of whom are participating
240 in or financing or directly interested in the dispute.
241 (2) "Stoppage of work" as used in this subsection
242 means a substantial diminution of the activities, production
243 or services at the establishment, plant, factory or premises
244 of the employing unit. This definition shall not apply to a
245 strike where the employees in the bargaining unit who
246 initiated the strike are participating in the strike. Such
247 employees shall not be eligible for waiting week credit or
248 benefits during the period when the strike is in effect,
249 regardless of diminution, unless the employer has been found
250 guilty of an unfair labor practice by the National Labor
251 Relations Board or a federal court of law for an act or
252 actions preceding or during the strike.
253 7. On or after January 1, 1978, benefits shall not be
254 paid to any individual on the basis of any services,
255 substantially all of which consist of participating in
256 sports or athletic events or training or preparing to so


257 participate, for any week which commences during the period
258 between two successive sport seasons (or similar periods) if
259 such individual performed such services in the first of such
260 seasons (or similar periods) and there is a reasonable
261 assurance that such individual will perform such services in
262 the later of such seasons (or similar periods).
263 8. Benefits shall not be payable on the basis of
264 services performed by an alien, unless such alien is an
265 individual who was lawfully admitted for permanent residence
266 at the time such services were performed, was lawfully
267 present for purposes of performing such services, or was
268 permanently residing in the United States under color of law
269 at the time such services were performed (including an alien
270 who was lawfully present in the United States as a result of
271 the application of the provisions of Section 212(d)(5) of
272 the Immigration and Nationality Act).
273 (1) Any data or information required of individuals
274 applying for benefits to determine whether benefits are not
275 payable to them because of their alien status shall be
276 uniformly required from all applicants for benefits.
277 (2) In the case of an individual whose application for
278 benefits would otherwise be approved, no determination that
279 benefits to such individual are not payable because of such
280 individual's alien status shall be made except upon a
281 preponderance of the evidence.
282 9. A claimant shall be ineligible for waiting week
283 credit or benefits for any week such claimant has an
284 outstanding penalty which was assessed based upon an
285 overpayment of benefits, as provided for in subsection 9 of
286 section 288.380.
287 10. The directors of the division of employment
288 security and the [division] office of workforce development
289 shall submit to the governor, the speaker of the house of


290 representatives, and the president pro tem of the senate no
291 later than October 15, 2006, a report outlining their
292 recommendations for how to improve work search verification
293 and claimant reemployment activities. The recommendations
294 shall include, but not limited to how to best utilize
295 "greathires.org", and how to reduce the average duration of
296 unemployment insurance claims. Each calendar year
297 thereafter, the directors shall submit a report containing
298 their recommendations on these issues by December thirty-
299 first of each year.
300 11. For purposes of this section, a claimant may
301 satisfy reporting requirements provided under this section
302 by reporting by internet communication or any other means
303 deemed acceptable by the division of employment security.
620.010. 1. There is hereby created a "Department of
Economic Development" to be headed by a director appointed
by the governor, by and with the advice and consent of the
senate. All of the general provisions, definitions and
powers enumerated in section 1 of the Omnibus State
Reorganization Act of 1974 shall continue to apply to this
department and its divisions, agencies and personnel.
2. The powers, duties and functions vested in the
public service commission, chapters 386, 387, 388, 389, 390,
392, 393, and others, and the administrative hearing
commission, sections 621.015 to 621.198 and others, are
transferred by type III transfers to the department of
economic development. The director of the department is
directed to provide and coordinate staff and equipment
services to these agencies in the interest of facilitating
the work of the bodies and achieving optimum efficiency in
staff services common to all the bodies. Nothing in the
Reorganization Act of 1974 shall prevent the chairman of the
public service commission from presenting additional budget


requests or from explaining or clarifying its budget
requests to the governor or general assembly.
3. The powers, duties and functions vested in the
office of the public counsel are transferred by type III
transfer to the department of economic development. Funding
for the general counsel's office shall be by general revenue.
4. The public service commission is authorized to
employ such staff as it deems necessary for the functions
performed by the general counsel other than those powers,
duties and functions relating to representation of the
public before the public service commission.
5. All the powers, duties and functions vested in the
tourism commission, chapter 258 and others, are transferred
to the "Division of Tourism", which is hereby created, by
type III transfer.
6. All the powers, duties and functions of the
department of community affairs, chapter 251 and others, not
otherwise assigned, are transferred by type I transfer to
the department of economic development, and the department
of community affairs is abolished. The director of the
department of economic development may assume all the duties
of the director of community affairs or may establish within
the department such subunits and advisory committees as may
be required to administer the programs so transferred. The
director of the department shall appoint all members of such
committees and heads of subunits.
7. The Missouri housing development commission,
chapter 215, is assigned to the department of economic
development, but shall remain a governmental instrumentality
of the state of Missouri and shall constitute a body
corporate and politic.
8. [All the authority, powers, duties, functions,
records, personnel, property, matters pending and other


pertinent vestiges of the division of manpower planning of
the department of social services are transferred by a type
I transfer to the "Division of Workforce Development", which
is hereby created, within the department of economic
development. The division of manpower planning within the
department of social services is abolished. The provisions
of section 1 of the Omnibus State Reorganization Act of
1974, Appendix B, relating to the manner and procedures for
transfers of state agencies shall apply to the transfers
provided in this section.
9. All the authority, powers, functions, records,
personnel, property, contracts, matters pending and other
pertinent vestiges of the division of employment security
within the department of labor and industrial relations
related to job training and labor exchange that are funded
with or based upon Wagner-Peyser funds, and other federal
and state workforce development programs administered by the
division of employment security are transferred by a type I
transfer to the division of workforce development within the
department of economic development.
10.] Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
defined in section 536.010, that is created under the
authority delegated in this section shall become effective
only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
2008, shall be invalid and void.


Section 1. 1. For purposes of this section,
"activities association" means any nonprofit statewide
organization that satisfies the following criteria:
(1) The organization facilitates interscholastic
activities for secondary school students, including, but not
limited to, interscholastic athletic activities;
(2) More than fifty percent of the activities
facilitated by the organization are interscholastic athletic
activities; and
(3) The organization's members include at least one
public school or school district that pays any fees to such
association, including, but not limited to, activity
participation fees, tournament registration fees, membership
fees, or any other fees or payments relating to membership
in the organization or participation in any activities
facilitated by the organization;
(4) The term "activities association" does not include
organizations that do not facilitate interscholastic
athletic activities. Such organizations may include, but
are not limited to, career and technical student
organizations, academic honor societies, service
organizations, leadership organizations, or other student
clubs or organizations that do not facilitate
interscholastic athletic activities.
2. No student shall be declared ineligible to
participate in an interscholastic activity or competition,
including, but not limited to, an interscholastic athletic
activity or competition, solely as a result of school
district consolidation or closing a school under section
162.223. A student who is assigned or reassigned to attend
a different school district, public school, or attendance
center as a consequence of such consolidation shall be
deemed not to have transferred schools for purposes of


eligibility under any applicable rules governing student
participation in interscholastic activities or competitions,
regardless of the school to which the student transfers in
the year of consolidation or the following year.
3. A school district shall not be a member of, or
remit any funds to, an activities association that would
cause such school district to violate subsection 2 of this
section.
Section 2. 1. This section shall be known and may be
cited as the "Missouri Taxpayer Debt Relief and School
Facilities Act". It is the intent of the general assembly
through the Missouri taxpayer debt relief and school
facilities act to:
(1) Provide state support for public school facility
projects that are currently funded by local property
taxpayers; and
(2) Reduce the property tax burden on Missouri
taxpayers by lowering the amount of bonded indebtedness and
property tax levies of school districts that need to finance
necessary capital improvements in academic facilities.
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Academic facility", a building or space, and
related portions of the physical plant and grounds, where
public school students receive instruction that is an
integral part of an adequate public education program,
including classrooms, libraries, laboratories, and related
support spaces, but excluding:
(a) Central or district administration buildings;
(b) Noninstructional warehouses, bus barns, and
maintenance facilities;
(c) Athletic stadiums and similar competition venues,
except to the extent a portion of such facilities is
regularly scheduled instructional space; and


(d) Facilities leased from or by the district, unless
otherwise provided by rule of the commission;
(2) "Commission", the Missouri commission on academic
facilities established in this section;
(3) "Facility condition index", a ratio that compares
the cost of repairing or renovating an academic facility to
the cost of replacing such facility, as determined by the
commission by rule;
(4) "Fiscal capacity", the relative ability of a
school district to raise local resources for capital
projects, as determined by the commission, which may include
consideration of a district's property tax base, income
levels, existing debt service, and other factors the
commission deems appropriate;
(5) "Immediate repair project", an academic facilities
project that addresses an existing condition that presents a
substantial and imminent danger to the health or safety of
occupants, a serious deficiency in structural integrity or
major building systems, or an urgent need to comply with
applicable building, fire, or accessibility code
requirements;
(6) "Local resources", the portion of the cost of a
project to be funded from revenues of the school district,
including proceeds of bonds, capital levies, or other
locally controlled funds, but excluding any moneys received
from the Missouri academic facilities partnership fund;
(7) "Maintenance, repair, and renovation", any
activity, improvement, or work on an academic facility that
maintains, conserves, or restores the condition or
efficiency of the facility, including, but not limited to,
roof repair or replacement, HVAC, electrical, plumbing,
interior finishes, accessibility improvements, and code
compliance upgrades;


(8) "New construction", any improvement that brings an
academic facility to a better condition or efficiency,
including construction of a new building, additions to an
existing building, or major alterations that significantly
change capacity or function;
(9) "Operating levy for school purposes", as such term
is defined in section 163.011 or any successor provision;
(10) "Performance levy", as such term is defined in
section 163.011 or any successor provision;
(11) "Project", an undertaking by a school district
involving maintenance, repair, and renovation, new
construction, or any combination thereof, with respect to
one or more academic facilities;
(12) "School district" or "district", any public
school district organized under the laws of this state.
3. There is hereby created the "Missouri Commission on
Academic Facilities". The commission shall be housed within
the department of elementary and secondary education for
administrative purposes, and such department shall provide
staff and administrative support to the commission.
Appointed members of the commission shall serve six-year
terms, and all members of the commission shall serve without
compensation but may be reimbursed for necessary expenses
incurred in the performance of their duties. The commission
shall consist of the following seven members, who shall have
demonstrated experience in public school administration,
school facility planning or construction, or public finance:
(1) The commissioner of education or the
commissioner's designee;
(2) Two members appointed by the governor, not more
than one from the same political party;
(3) One member appointed by the president pro tempore
of the Missouri senate;


(4) One member appointed by the senate minority
leader; and
(5) Two members appointed by the speaker of the house
of representatives, not more than one from the same
political party.
4. The commission shall:
(1) Administer the Missouri academic facilities
partnership fund and implement this section;
100 (2) Adopt rules to implement this section, including
101 rules establishing:
102 (a) Application procedures and timelines;
103 (b) Project evaluation criteria and scoring systems;
104 (c) Project categories and definitions that, at a
105 minimum, distinguish projects that address health, safety,
106 and code compliance needs; major maintenance, repair,
107 renovation, and replacement projects; and new construction,
108 additions, and space or capacity projects;
109 (d) Facility standards and a facility condition index
110 methodology;
111 (e) Reporting, monitoring, and audit requirements; and
112 (f) A methodology for state and local cost sharing
113 based on district fiscal capacity;
114 (3) Review and approve or disapprove school district
115 applications for state financial participation in academic
116 facilities projects;
117 (4) Determine, for each approved project, the state
118 share and local share of eligible project costs in
119 accordance with the cost sharing methodology established
120 under this section;
121 (5) Apply the priorities and factors set forth in this
122 section and annually adopt a statewide prioritized list of
123 projects recommended for funding; and


124 (6) Monitor the use of state funds and project
125 completion and require such reports and audits from school
126 districts as are necessary to ensure compliance with this
127 section and rules adopted under it.
128 5. Except as expressly provided in this section, all
129 procedures, standards, criteria, and scoring systems
130 governing applications for and awards of state financial
131 participation shall be determined by the commission by rule
132 and may be modified over time as the commission deems
133 necessary to prudently and resourcefully expend state funds.
134 6. The commission shall establish, by rule, a
135 methodology for determining the relative fiscal capacity of
136 each school district to provide local resources for academic
137 facilities projects and the respective state and local
138 shares of eligible project costs for districts that receive
139 state financial participation. In developing this
140 methodology, the commission shall consider measures of
141 district fiscal capacity that may include, but need not be
142 limited to, assessed valuation, property wealth per pupil,
143 income levels, the district's operating levy, existing debt
144 service obligations, and other indicators of the ability to
145 raise local capital. The commission shall ensure that
146 districts with lower fiscal capacity and higher operating
147 levies generally qualify for higher effective state support
148 than districts with higher fiscal capacity and lower
149 operating levies. The commission shall, by rule, establish
150 minimum and maximum state participation percentages for
151 eligible project costs and may differentiate such
152 percentages among project categories described in this
153 section.
154 7. (1) There is hereby created in the state treasury
155 the "Missouri School Facilities Partnership Fund", which
156 shall consist of moneys appropriated by the general assembly


157 and any other moneys authorized by law to be deposited in
158 the fund. The state treasurer shall be custodian of the
159 fund. In accordance with sections 30.170 and 30.180, the
160 state treasurer may approve disbursements. The fund shall
161 be a dedicated fund and, upon appropriation, moneys in this
162 fund shall be used solely to provide state financial
163 participation in eligible academic facilities projects for
164 school districts under this section and to pay the
165 reasonable administrative costs of the department of
166 elementary and secondary education and the commission
167 established in this section.
168 (2) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080
169 to the contrary, any moneys remaining in the fund at the end
170 of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the
171 general revenue fund.
172 (3) The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the
173 fund in the same manner as other funds are invested. Any
174 interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
175 credited to the fund.
176 8. Notwithstanding any provision of this section to
177 the contrary, a school district may apply to the commission
178 for state financial participation in an academic facilities
179 project only if:
180 (1) The district has adopted and submitted to the
181 commission a long range facilities plan in a form approved
182 by the commission;
183 (2) The proposed project is consistent with that plan
184 and with applicable facility standards established by the
185 commission; and
186 (3) The district's current operating levy for school
187 purposes is at or above the performance levy, or the
188 district's operating levy for school purposes was at or
189 above the performance levy at any point during the preceding


190 four fiscal years but was reduced below such levy amount due
191 to a constitutionally mandated rollback.
192 9. In each funding cycle, the commission shall award
193 state financial participation in accordance with the
194 following priorities:
195 (1) First order priority shall be given to projects
196 that address substantial and imminent dangers to health or
197 safety, serious deficiencies in structural integrity or
198 major building systems, or urgent compliance with building,
199 fire, or accessibility codes in academic facilities,
200 including immediate repair projects;
201 (2) Second order priority shall be given to projects
202 that create substantial and demonstrable efficiencies in the
203 ongoing costs of operation of a school district, including,
204 but not limited to, projects that reduce utility or
205 maintenance costs, improve energy efficiency, or modernize
206 facilities in connection with voluntary consolidation,
207 annexation, or cooperative reorganization of districts or
208 attendance centers;
209 (3) Third order priority shall be given to projects
210 that remedy significant facility condition deficiencies,
211 extend the useful life of academic facilities, or replace
212 facilities whose facility condition index exceeds a
213 threshold established by the commission; and
214 (4) Fourth order priority shall be given to projects
215 that provide additional capacity or reconfigured space
216 necessary to accommodate enrollment growth, eliminate
217 excessive reliance on temporary classrooms, or support
218 educationally required programmatic changes.
219 10. Within and among the priority categories
220 established in subsection 9 of this section, the commission
221 shall further prioritize projects by considering at least


222 the following factors, in such manner and relative weight as
223 the commission shall establish by rule:
224 (1) The severity of the facility need and the
225 educational impact of the project, including facility
226 condition, educational adequacy, and enrollment pressures;
227 (2) The school district's fiscal capacity, so that
228 districts with lower fiscal capacity receive higher
229 effective state support;
230 (3) The school district's operating levy, so that
231 districts with higher levies receive higher effective state
232 support to lower or mitigate increases in the amount of
233 property taxes residents must pay than districts with lower
234 operating levies;
235 (4) The extent to which the district is already
236 relying on local funding effort, prioritizing districts that
237 receive less than half of their total revenue from state
238 sources, including:
239 (a) Existing debt service millage or equivalent local
240 levy for capital purposes; and
241 (b) The proportion of total operating and capital
242 revenues derived from local sources;
243 (5) The availability or lack of additional local
244 bonding capacity for facilities purposes, including
245 districts that are at, or within a threshold established by
246 the commission of, the maximum bonded indebtedness level
247 permitted by law or commission policy, or that can otherwise
248 demonstrate insufficient remaining bonding capacity to
249 address critical facility needs without state participation;
250 (6) The degree of local matching commitment associated
251 with the project, including:
252 (a) Local cash or in-kind contributions, including
253 proceeds of bonds or levies, dedicated deposits to a capital


254 and maintenance reserve fund, or other local capital
255 sources; and
256 (b) Local actions that provide property tax relief to
257 district residents in connection with the project, such as:
258 a. Reducing existing or planned debt service levies
259 due to state participation; or
260 b. Avoiding or reducing the need for new or higher
261 debt service levies that would otherwise be required to
262 complete the project; and
263 (7) The prudent and resourceful expenditure of state
264 funds, including consideration of life cycle cost, energy
265 efficiency, and the extent to which state dollars leverage
266 or replace local borrowing in a manner that reduces long
267 term tax burdens while addressing facility needs.
268 11. The commission shall publish, at least annually,
269 the statewide prioritized list of projects recommended for
270 funding and shall identify, for each project, the category
271 and principal factors supporting the commission's
272 recommended priority.
273 12. No project shall receive state financial
274 participation under this section unless the district
275 demonstrates a good faith local matching commitment, as
276 determined by the commission.
277 13. In awarding state financial participation, the
278 commission shall give favorable consideration to projects
279 that are accompanied by a plan, approved by the district's
280 governing board, that uses state participation to offset or
281 reduce the amount of new local debt that would otherwise be
282 required for the project or allows for a reduction in future
283 debt service levies or avoidance of levy increases that
284 would otherwise be needed.
285 14. The commission shall not require a district
286 eligible to apply for state financial participation under


287 subsection 8 of this section to increase local tax rates as
288 a condition of receiving state financial participation. The
289 commission shall ensure that state funds are allocated in a
290 manner that reasonably balances:
291 (1) Preference for districts demonstrating strong
292 local effort;
293 (2) Consideration for districts with limited remaining
294 bonding capacity; and
295 (3) The goal of mitigating, where practicable, the
296 long term property tax burden associated with necessary
297 facility improvements.
298 15. A district receiving state financial participation
299 shall comply with all applicable procurement, construction,
300 and reporting requirements and shall complete the project
301 substantially as described in such district's approved
302 application, unless otherwise authorized by the commission.
303 16. The commission may withhold, suspend, or require
304 repayment of state funds if the commission finds that a
305 district has materially violated the requirements of this
306 section, rules promulgated under this section, or the terms
307 of such district's approved project.
308 17. The commission shall promulgate rules to implement
309 the provisions of this section. Any rule or portion of a
310 rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
311 created under the authority delegated in this section shall
312 become effective only if it complies with and is subject to
313 all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
314 section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are
315 nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
316 general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay
317 the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are
318 subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of


319 rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
320 August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
[167.910. 1. There is hereby established
the "Career Readiness Course Task Force" to
explore the possibility of a course covering the
topics described in this section being offered
in the public schools to students in eighth
grade or ninth grade. Task force members shall
be chosen to represent the geographic diversity
of the state. All task force members shall be
appointed before October 31, 2018. The task
force members shall be appointed as follows:
(1) A parent of a student attending
elementary school, appointed by the joint
committee on education;
(2) A parent of a student attending a
grade not lower than the sixth nor higher than
the eighth grade, appointed by the joint
committee on education;
(3) A parent of a student attending high
school, appointed by the joint committee on
education;
(4) An elementary education professional
from an accredited school district, appointed by
the joint committee on education from names
submitted by statewide education employee
organizations;
(5) Two education professionals giving
instruction in a grade or grades not lower than
the sixth nor higher than the eighth grade in
accredited school districts, appointed by the
joint committee on education from names
submitted by statewide education employee
organizations;
(6) Two secondary education professionals
from accredited school districts, appointed by
the joint committee on education from names
submitted by statewide education employee
organizations;
(7) A career and technical education
professional who has experience serving as an
advisor to a statewide career and technical
education organization, appointed by a statewide
career and technical education organization;


(8) An education professional from an
accredited technical high school, appointed by a
statewide career and technical education
organization;
(9) A public school board member,
appointed by a statewide association of school
boards;
(10) A secondary school principal,
appointed by a statewide association of
secondary school principals;
(11) A principal of a school giving
instruction in a grade or grades not lower than
the sixth nor higher than the eighth grade,
appointed by a statewide association of
secondary school principals;
(12) An elementary school counselor,
appointed by a statewide association of school
counselors;
(13) Two school counselors from a school
giving instruction in a grade or grades not
lower than the sixth nor higher than the eighth
grade, appointed by a statewide association of
school counselors;
(14) A secondary school counselor,
appointed by a statewide association of school
counselors;
(15) A secondary school career and college
counselor, appointed by a statewide association
of school counselors;
(16) An apprenticeship professional,
appointed by the division of workforce
development of economic development;
(17) A representative of Missouri Project
Lead the Way, appointed by the statewide Project
Lead the Way organization;
(18) A representative of the state
technical college, appointed by the state
technical college;
(19) A representative of a public
community college, appointed by a statewide
organization of community colleges; and
(20) A representative of a public four-
year institution of higher education, appointed
by the commissioner of higher education.
2. The members of the task force
established under subsection 1 of this section


shall elect a chair from among the membership of
the task force. The task force shall meet as
needed to complete its consideration of the
course described in subsection 5 of this section
and provide its findings and recommendations as
described in subsection 6 of this section.
Members of the task force shall serve without
compensation. No school district policy or
administrative action shall require any
education employee member to use personal leave
or incur a reduction in pay for participating on
100 the task force.
101 3. The task force shall hold at least
102 three public hearings to provide an opportunity
103 to receive public testimony including, but not
104 limited to, testimony from educators, local
105 school boards, parents, representatives from
106 business and industry, labor and community
107 leaders, members of the general assembly, and
108 the general public.
109 4. The department of elementary and
110 secondary education shall provide such legal,
111 research, clerical, and technical services as
112 the task force may require in the performance of
113 its duties.
114 5. The task force established under
115 subsection 1 of this section shall consider a
116 course that:
117 (1) Gives students an opportunity to
118 explore various career and educational
119 opportunities by:
120 (a) Administering career surveys to
121 students and helping students use Missouri
122 Connections to determine their career interests
123 and develop plans to meet their career goals;
124 (b) Explaining the differences between
125 types of colleges, including two-year and four-
126 year colleges and noting the availability of
127 registered apprenticeship programs as
128 alternatives to college for students;
129 (c) Describing technical degrees offered
130 by colleges;
131 (d) Explaining the courses and educational
132 experiences offered at community colleges;
133 (e) Describing the various certificates
134 and credentials available to earn at the school


135 or other schools including, but not limited to,
136 career and technical education certificates
137 described under section 170.029 and industry-
138 recognized certificates and credentials;
139 (f) Advising students of any advanced
140 placement courses that they may take at the
141 school;
142 (g) Describing any opportunities at the
143 school for dual enrollment;
144 (h) Advising students of any Project Lead
145 the Way courses offered at the school and
146 explaining how Project Lead the Way courses help
147 students learn valuable skills;
148 (i) Informing students of the availability
149 of funding for postsecondary education through
150 the A+ schools program described under section
151 160.545;
152 (j) Describing the availability of virtual
153 courses;
154 (k) Describing the types of skills and
155 occupations most in demand in the current job
156 market and those skills and occupations likely
157 to be in high demand in future years;
158 (l) Describing the typical salaries for
159 occupations, salary trends, and opportunities
160 for advancement in various occupations;
161 (m) Emphasizing the opportunities
162 available in careers involving science,
163 technology, engineering, and math;
164 (n) Advising students of the resources
165 offered by workforce or job centers;
166 (o) Preparing students for the ACT
167 assessment or the ACT WorkKeys assessments
168 required for the National Career Readiness
169 Certificate;
170 (p) Administering a practice ACT
171 assessment or practice ACT WorkKeys assessments
172 required for the National Career Readiness
173 Certificate to students;
174 (q) Advising students of opportunities to
175 take the SAT and the Armed Services Vocational
176 Aptitude Battery;
177 (r) Administering a basic math test to
178 students so that they can assess their math
179 skills;


180 (s) Administering a basic writing test to
181 students so that they can assess their writing
182 skills;
183 (t) Helping each student prepare a
184 personal plan of study that outlines a sequence
185 of courses and experiences that concludes with
186 the student reaching his or her postsecondary
187 goals; and
188 (u) Explaining how to complete college
189 applications and the Free Application for
190 Federal Student Aid;
191 (2) Focuses on career readiness and
192 emphasizes the importance of work ethic,
193 communication, collaboration, critical thinking,
194 and creativity;
195 (3) Demonstrates that graduation from a
196 four-year college is not the only pathway to
197 success by describing to students at least
198 sixteen pathways to success in detail and
199 including guest visitors who represent each
200 pathway described. In exploring how these
201 pathways could be covered in the course, the
202 task force shall consider how instructors for
203 the course may be able to rely on assistance
204 from Missouri's career pathways within the
205 department of elementary and secondary education;
206 (4) Provides student loan counseling; and
207 (5) May include parent-student meetings.
208 6. Before December 1, 2019, the task force
209 established under subsection 1 of this section
210 shall present its findings and recommendations
211 to the speaker of the house of representatives,
212 the president pro tempore of the senate, the
213 joint committee on education, and the state
214 board of education. Upon presenting the
215 findings and recommendations as described in
216 this subsection, the task force shall dissolve.]
[167.910. 1. There is hereby established
the "Career Readiness Course Task Force" to
explore the possibility of a course covering the
topics described in this section being offered
in the public schools to students in eighth
grade or ninth grade. Task force members shall
be chosen to represent the geographic diversity
of the state. All task force members shall be


appointed before October 31, 2018. The task
force members shall be appointed as follows:
(1) A parent of a student attending
elementary school, appointed by a statewide
association of parents and teachers;
(2) A parent of a student attending a
grade not lower than the sixth nor higher than
the eighth grade, appointed by a statewide
association of parents and teachers;
(3) A parent of a student attending high
school, appointed by a statewide association of
parents and teachers;
(4) An elementary education professional
from an accredited school district, appointed by
agreement among the Missouri State Teachers
Association, the Missouri National Education
Association, and the American Federation of
Teachers of Missouri;
(5) An education professional giving
instruction in a grade or grades not lower than
the sixth nor higher than the eighth grade in an
accredited school district, appointed by
agreement among the Missouri State Teachers
Association, the Missouri National Education
Association, and the American Federation of
Teachers of Missouri;
(6) A secondary education professional
from an accredited school district, appointed by
agreement among the Missouri State Teachers
Association, the Missouri National Education
Association, and the American Federation of
Teachers of Missouri;
(7) A career and technical education
professional who has experience serving as an
advisor to a statewide career and technical
education organization, appointed by a statewide
career and technical education organization;
(8) An education professional from an
accredited technical high school, appointed by a
statewide career and technical education
organization;
(9) A public school board member,
appointed by a statewide association of school
boards;


(10) A secondary school principal,
appointed by a statewide association of
secondary school principals;
(11) A principal of a school giving
instruction in a grade or grades not lower than
the sixth nor higher than the eighth grade,
appointed by a statewide association of
secondary school principals;
(12) An elementary school counselor,
appointed by a statewide association of school
counselors;
(13) A school counselor from a school
giving instruction in a grade or grades not
lower than the sixth nor higher than the eighth
grade, appointed by a statewide association of
school counselors;
(14) A secondary school counselor,
appointed by a statewide association of school
counselors;
(15) A secondary school career and college
counselor, appointed by a statewide association
of school counselors;
(16) An apprenticeship professional,
appointed by the division of workforce
development of the department of economic
development;
(17) A representative of Missouri Project
Lead the Way, appointed by the statewide Project
Lead the Way organization;
(18) A representative of the State
Technical College of Missouri, appointed by the
State Technical College of Missouri;
(19) A representative of a public
community college, appointed by a statewide
organization of community colleges; and
(20) A representative of a public four-
year institution of higher education, appointed
by the commissioner of higher education.
2. The members of the task force
established under subsection 1 of this section
shall elect a chair from among the membership of
the task force. The task force shall meet as
needed to complete its consideration of the
course described in subsection 5 of this section
and provide its findings and recommendations as
described in subsection 6 of this section.


Members of the task force shall serve without
100 compensation. No school district policy or
101 administrative action shall require any
102 education employee member to use personal leave
103 or incur a reduction in pay for participating on
104 the task force.
105 3. The task force shall hold at least
106 three public hearings to provide an opportunity
107 to receive public testimony including, but not
108 limited to, testimony from educators, local
109 school boards, parents, representatives from
110 business and industry, labor and community
111 leaders, members of the general assembly, and
112 the general public.
113 4. The department of elementary and
114 secondary education shall provide such legal,
115 research, clerical, and technical services as
116 the task force may require in the performance of
117 its duties.
118 5. The task force established under
119 subsection 1 of this section shall consider a
120 course that:
121 (1) Gives students an opportunity to
122 explore various career and educational
123 opportunities by:
124 (a) Administering career surveys to
125 students and helping students use Missouri
126 Connections to determine their career interests
127 and develop plans to meet their career goals;
128 (b) Explaining the differences between
129 types of colleges, including two-year and four-
130 year colleges, and noting the availability of
131 registered apprenticeship programs as
132 alternatives to college for students;
133 (c) Describing technical degrees offered
134 by colleges;
135 (d) Explaining the courses and educational
136 experiences offered at community colleges;
137 (e) Describing the various certificates
138 and credentials available to earn at the school
139 or other schools including, but not limited to,
140 career and technical education certificates
141 described under section 170.029 and industry-
142 recognized certificates and credentials;


143 (f) Advising students of any advanced
144 placement courses that they may take at the
145 school;
146 (g) Describing any opportunities at the
147 school for dual enrollment;
148 (h) Advising students of any Project Lead
149 the Way courses offered at the school and
150 explaining how Project Lead the Way courses help
151 students learn valuable skills;
152 (i) Informing students of the availability
153 of funding for postsecondary education through
154 the A+ schools program described under section
155 160.545;
156 (j) Describing the availability of virtual
157 courses;
158 (k) Describing the types of skills and
159 occupations most in demand in the current job
160 market and those skills and occupations likely
161 to be in high demand in future years;
162 (l) Describing the typical salaries for
163 occupations, salary trends, and opportunities
164 for advancement in various occupations;
165 (m) Emphasizing the opportunities
166 available in careers involving science,
167 technology, engineering, and math;
168 (n) Advising students of the resources
169 offered by workforce or job centers;
170 (o) Preparing students for the ACT
171 assessment or the ACT WorkKeys assessments
172 required for the National Career Readiness
173 Certificate;
174 (p) Administering a practice ACT
175 assessment or practice ACT WorkKeys assessments
176 required for the National Career Readiness
177 Certificate to students;
178 (q) Advising students of opportunities to
179 take the SAT and the Armed Services Vocational
180 Aptitude Battery;
181 (r) Administering a basic math test to
182 students so that they can assess their math
183 skills;
184 (s) Administering a basic writing test to
185 students so that they can assess their writing
186 skills;
187 (t) Helping each student prepare a
188 personal plan of study that outlines a sequence


189 of courses and experiences that concludes with
190 the student reaching his or her postsecondary
191 goals; and
192 (u) Explaining how to complete college
193 applications and the Free Application for
194 Federal Student Aid;
195 (2) Focuses on career readiness and
196 emphasizes the importance of work ethic,
197 communication, collaboration, critical thinking,
198 and creativity;
199 (3) Demonstrates that graduation from a
200 four-year college is not the only pathway to
201 success by describing to students at least
202 sixteen pathways to success in detail and
203 including guest visitors who represent each
204 pathway described. In exploring how these
205 pathways could be covered in the course, the
206 task force shall consider how instructors for
207 the course may be able to rely on assistance
208 from Missouri Career Pathways within the
209 department of elementary and secondary education;
210 (4) Provides student loan counseling; and
211 (5) May include parent-student meetings.
212 6. Before December 1, 2019, the task force
213 established under subsection 1 of this section
214 shall present its findings and recommendations
215 to the speaker of the house of representatives,
216 the president pro tempore of the senate, the
217 joint committee on education, and the state
218 board of education. Upon presenting the
219 findings and recommendations as described in
220 this subsection, the task force shall dissolve.]
Section B. The repeal and reenactment of sections
135.713, 135.714, 135.715, 135.716, 135.719, 166.700,
166.705, 166.710, and 166.715 shall become effective on July
1, 2027.
Section C. In the event that any section, provision,
clause, phrase, or word of this act or the application
thereof is declared invalid under the Constitution of the
United States or the Constitution of the State of Missouri,
whether on procedural or substantive grounds, it is the
intent of the general assembly that the remaining sections


of this act remain in force and effect as far as they are
capable of being carried into execution as intended by the
general assembly. The general assembly hereby declares that
it would have passed each section, provision, clause,
phrase, or word thereof, irrespective of the fact that any
one or more sections, provisions, clauses, phrases, or words
of this act or the application of this act would be declared
unenforceable, unconstitutional, or invalid.